You learn to program in very much the same way that you learn to be a musician: you study excellent works and you practice a lot.  Find programs, written in your language of choice, that other people consider excellent, and obtain the source code. Pore over it and try to understand it.  Many people, over the years, develop their own toy problem to solve in each new programming language they learn. The advantage of this is that you  know the domain very well, so you're motivated to seek certain solutions in the libraries and techniques of the new language. I like to write a "babelizer" that translates back and forth between languages using babelfish or Google translate. Plenty of real-world problems to solve there, but not brain surgery.
nice nice dat hydro!! nahm sayin!
yea, thats what we thought, fox.
Come on, you know it can't be cake.
I'm not unfamiliar with Stein's position, but hadn't had the opportunity to actually watch this movie until this post caught my attention.  I knew from the opening credits and the Godwin-like imagery it wasn't going to end well.   For 60 minutes, Stein plays an unconvincing faux-ignorant truth-seeker, and then it gets retarted. He manages to get somebody to say that atheism is a necessary ingredient for nazism, in so many words. Pianos drone in E minor, his tone grows increasingly ominous - it's awesome. You should really watch this if you haven't already.
When you don't clean up your mess, someone else has to do it for you. It doesn't just evaporate on its own.  What the hell, coworkers.
I was unaware that any schools offered an MD/PhD in ninjaing program.
I never listen to lyrics, as far as I can tell because I am too lazy.  Consequently most music from an artist sounds the same to me - someone whining into a microphone with the same backing instruments.  I prefer the music to be fast paced and interesting (can't stand classical as it is way too slow, but techo remixes are great).  I do like when the human voice is used as an instrument - for example the "opera" singer in Fifth Element.  Favourite genre is [vocal trance](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vocal_trance) - try some at [di.fm](http://www.di.fm/vocaltrance/).  I do get highly amused when people tell me what songs are about.  Usually rather surprising stuff like masturbation, religion (I'm atheist) etc.  I had assumed that there was a certain quality to lyrics, so that they could stand alone as a work of poetry.  Then I actually bothered to read the lyrics for a karoakeized song on the Wedding Singer DVD and was appalled at the [drivel](http://www.lyricsondemand.com/onehitwonders/rappersdelightlyrics.html).  I am still in shock that people can find any pleasure in that kind of crap.
Carrie Fisher is good looking.
Macross: Do You Remember Love. Blows away pretty much anything else.   I also liked Kiki's Delivery Service a lot. 
quite.
smash some bitch? Who says this expression? 
It's also hard to enforce laws on entertainment like circuses because they move around a lot (i know that sounds like a mute point but it must mean something) and the problem with these laws is the fact that you have to announce that you will be visiting the premises beforehand. Its like when the RSPCA is going to visit a pig farm they have to give 2 weeks notice. Its completely useless.   I think when it comes to animals an outright ban is needed. We should have stopped this primitive shit a long time ago.
Please tell me about the software you use that keeps track of my posts.
I'm trying.
I'm not really sure without looking it up, but I know I was surprised at how typical the "mental disability ineligible for prison" situation is. Also, when I left I knew it was turning into a little sub-industry to make lock-down facilities for mentally disabled people, and that houses in the suburbs, like this situation, were going out of style. At least that's what I heard at the time, and bureaucracy moves slowly.
At least they have a conscience, Christians don't.
Who is surprised that someone who writes code for a living (a programmer) spends a lot of time reading, writing, testing, and fixing code?
stop that!
I would try it out but it appears to be PC only :(  I have no problem redrawing it (and indeed assume that's what will happen), the map is still expanding and is currently maybe a fifth of the total size it'll be.  As for the map, it's important for this style of game as it has a large strategic element to it and removal of the map would really hinder things.
People should not knee-jerk their response to this just because Glenn Beck's name is associated with it.  The implications are horrendous because you have to realize that no one in their right mind could begin to justify what is in the statements you have to agree to.  You also have to realize that nothing like this on a federal web site is put up by J Random Developer but that every word of it was carefully considered by a committee and no one spoke up and said "Hey, isn't this fundamentally un-American?".
MURDER is compassion? You are an absolute goddamned xtian pretard. That MUST be a FACT. There is NOTHING insipid about me. There is PLENTY insipid about you. Give me YOUR background. What have YOU achieved? What have YOU produced? I like to (these days) look at teh BIGGER picture. I doubt you get that in the least.   Why do you say "sir" when you don't mean it? Just ONE of your 'tells'.
Can't say I have this problem, but then again I am fucking awesome.
I actually didn't say that, but yes, that is exactly how Bush used them - and since Obama seems intent on not limiting any of the powers Bush established (many of which he established for the first time), he may as well destroy all these evil programs.  It is, after all, his responsibility to faithfully execute the laws of the country, in accordance with the Fourth Amendment, which expressly forbids things like warrantless wiretaps (the right to be secure in your papers or person...it does not take much imagination to think that the people who wrote that would add 'phone calls' if they knew they were possible).  Not that this is his only method of recourse for destroying them.  You may agree to disagree with me, but you will still be wrong.  Obama isn't sitting in his office playing battleship against lobbyists, he has CONTROL of the executive branch of the government.
Try it in safe mode..
So, forgetting about the slightly aggressive tone of your argument (so i'll leave the references to being a child).  Selfishness is a big part of natural selection - Altruism is something that Anthropologists have studied in various contexts for decades if not centuries.  Is enlightenment helping others? Even if say, their 'rubbish liver' genes live on when they reproduce with their shiny new liver - you're arguably weakening the species. It's something that I do find interesting, and think about a lot.  I use ancient history as an example but we usually only help people if something's in it for us. There are very few things i can think of which I can call truly selfless. Even when helping an old lady across the street I might hope to be seen by friends so that my samaritan act can be recognised - and i'm not sure that's so rare no matter how high your horse.
Game theory is not science, it is a mathematical not empirical discipline. It has more in common with speculative economic theories than hard science. It also fails to account for intersubjective communication and assumes strict rational actor models all which by the way, are far from being comprehensively demonstrated as actually representing human behaviour.  "Game theory is science, morality is bullshit." The two are not competing theories, silly. Game theory does not make moral claims any more than my spreadsheet does. Its completely arbitrary.
As long as you kill yourself.
One small step? More like a giant leap.
What you're talking about doesn't change the fact that putting one unit of something with another gets you two units of that something. You're using terminology to compare apples to oranges. If I define the digit denoted by the symbol "1" to equal "-8," and then say 1+1 = -16, that doesn't invalidate the initial notion that having two is the result taking one unit and another unit. Or, if I define that numbers above 1 reset to zero, I can thenn say "1+1=0," but that doesn't mean I'll ever find a time where I take one apple, then another apple, and I find I have zero apples.
I think any phrase can be taken out of context and proved wrong.  I think this phrase is in the context of human interaction problems, not necessarily science.
Oh my god . . .
Sorry about that. Forward me the receipt (alexis@reddit.com) and I'll get this resolved posthaste.
HUH? gaunt⋅let 1  /ˈgɔntlɪt, ˈgɑnt-/ Show Spelled Pronunciation [gawnt-lit, gahnt-] Show IPA Use gauntlet in a Sentence –noun 1.  a medieval glove, as of mail or plate, worn by a knight in armor to protect the hand. 2.  a glove with an extended cuff for the wrist. 3.  the cuff itself. —Idioms 4.  take up the gauntlet, a.  to accept a challenge to fight: He was always willing to take up the gauntlet for a good cause. b.  to show one's defiance. Also, take up the glove. 5.  throw down the gauntlet, a.  to challenge. b.  to defy. Also, throw down the glove.   Im not sure what your driving at? #1 I watched that show and I find nothing wrong with women with meat on their bones(YA IM A BROTHA). #2 My wife has meat on her bones yummy. Dont buy into the lie every guy likes skinny women or that every skinny woman stays that way after marriage... look at her mom its pretty close to accurate as to what she'll look like but NOT ALWAYS.
What are you talking about?  You can.
[Chaaange??](http://www.southparkstudios.com/clips/155590/?searchterm=Night+of+the+Living+Homeless)
I got a good 9 hours in. :)
I'm curious now to know how they're treating you. The cookies I'm accustom to usually take around an hour to an hour and a half to kick.  Seeing as you haven't posted anything for two hours I'm being led to believe they knocked you on your ass.
I think this is the author's name. I've notice the same sig. on many Abstruse goose comic. Can anyone confirm this?
a burning shot of 151 and a delicious liquor maybe Grand Marner, extinguished and then promptly swallowed and covered is hot enough to vaporize the remaining alcohol. You can inhale this from under your hand if you haven't already had two.  I think it was called a backdraft.
Not to mention - man's laughter.
If by "talk" you mean "anal sex," then yes.
**thanks**! I just read through most of the wikipedia page and for all the diagrams and quotations I still did not understand it.  your 2 line comment was enough to enlighten me. I love paradoxes!   *edit: woah my comment duplicated itself. 
I upmodded you.
In my chest, I hope.
I can't believe I've never heard of this comic. Truly awesome.
It's more of a puberty thing, so you wouldn't have to worry about it for another 12 or 13 years.
Well Mr. Burns had done it,  The power plant had won it,  With Roger Clemens clucking all the while,  Mike Scioscia's tragic illness made us smile,  While Wade Boggs lay unconscious on the barroom tile...  We're talkin' softball...  From Maine to San Diego.  Talkin' softball...  Mattingly and Canseco.  Ken Griffey's grotesquely swollen jaw.  Steve Sax and his run-in with the law.  We're talkin' Homer... Ozzie and the Straw. 
threw
&gt; Give me a break--you were just touting the fancy whizz-doodle new explanation NIST has come up with. Why do you think they had to come up with it if the notion that gravity can overcome 47 tied together steel supports wasn't utter bs? Do you pay no attention at all to your own citations?  So you make claims with zero evidence at all and you think you can just shift the burden around and get out of it?  No thanks. You said it couldn't be done. I want to know why you think that. Show me the math you used. Or retract the claim. Thanks. NIST wrote thousands of pages explaining their math.. the least you can do is show me the equation you are using to refute them.
she does have a good coit uh voice, yeah
It wasn't when I posted this.  Oh  well.
We already had this discussion.  NIST relied on the pancake theory until 2006 to AVOID addressing the mechanics of collapse.  How does agreeing with me make me wrong or ignorant?  Are you really this confused, or are you just trying to put on a show?
I am a horrible *horrible* person.
Multi-pass?
Sounds like they were written by foreign students.
upvoted for being a canadian who canoes
yes...but it's a properly handled tantrum
The world is a vampire.
It upsets me to know so many of my countrymen are so fucking stupid.  No wonder we elect such shit politicians.
I would have been loving that shit if I was his age!  No harm, no foul.
I never knew how much Hard SciFi could move me.
Sorry bro.  If you have the wrong plumbing I would rather not.   No offense.   Im just going through some ruff shit with a female roommate and it would be nice to chill with a girl that will be sweet and nice to me.  Even if it is just a walk around downtown.
Or maybe I just don't like to get ripped off.
Nope. Sorry. Obvious.
I just checked your posts.  You *are* an asshole. Deserving of all the trash-talk you get.  If you can't take it, don't dish it out, fool.  Make that *blind* fool, since things in front of your face do not register in what passes for a brain.  BTW, calling someone a "faggot" just makes **you** look like you need to mature, as does calling someone a child.  I could go on, but in fact, you're kind of a run-of-the-mill closed-minded dickhead.  But don't take it person anally.
I never understand why ~10% of people tell you to leave the time you are calling.  Is there really some voicemail system out there that does not keep track of when messages are received?  I guess some answering machines might not have had that feature, but the only answering machine I ever used had that and was &lt;$20 about 15 years ago.
I helped a friend clean a laptop of various spyware/malware/adware/etc... whatever you want to call it. When I tried to run Spybot S&amp;D, the program locked up and then the computer began playing some rap beat and some rapper guy came in and started going "yo yo yo, scammy refinace website dot com has the SICKEST deals on mortgages! Six percent and up, yo!" or something to that effect.  I think I had my first ever kernel panic in my brain. After I snapped out of my shock (seriously? selling the financial instruments of home ownership to the demographic least likely to even try buying a home?) I rebooted in safe mode and ran my scans from there. 
I never thought about it like that!   I just found [this post putting the number of active subscribers at 11.5 million](http://forums.worldofwarcraft.com/thread.html?topicId=18313400526&amp;sid=1&amp;pageNo=1#7), now imagine that the average play time each week is a conservative 4 hours. That would mean:  11.5mil * 4 hours = 46 million hours  46 million hours / 24 = 1916666 days  1916666 days / 365 days = 5251 years  So every week five fucking millenia of man hours are spent playing WoW... Blizzard deserve a nobel peace prize!
Well if you're ever in the chicago area :-P  *Edit* Oh lordy, I just found an old post of yours with a shirtless self-pic... oh my... oh my... *breaks out the lotion*... *fapfapfap*
If that really happened something must have been defective.  My iPhone gets warm at times but what happened there is impossible.
I don't misunderstand.
I'd say the opposite. We are getting more picky with age.   When you were younger you had to settle for just boobs in a magazine or scrambled porn, and it was fine. But now you have oh so many choices.
I like it.
I think you may be misunderstanding this product. It seems to me that the data is still stored on disk. The optimization comes during query processing.
I prefer this one as the wolf is a meme and will pass with time but the envelope is around for good. (Or so I hope!)
I don't get it.  It looks like just about any car that's been in an accident.
0.05 miles from the taxi to the plane? What kind of magical airport is this?!
That, and formatted it nicely. I suspect that too many people don't know the song/the column.
OLD
Great idea  I just moved so I don't have any lifting friends in the area  Maybe there's a web service to find a lifting buddy? Will look
Saw a lot of them during the summers in the 90s... or at least their shells.  The girl a few doors down and I would flick them off the trees with sticks.  Wasn't too keen on actually touching the shells, but they were pretty cool.  Strangely, I haven't see their molted shells or even heard their chirping since maybe 1999.
We can't undo the agricultural revolution though, not without killing off  most of the human population.
Yes, of course he is socialist. His party is called "Movement towards Socialism".  Pissing off companies is better than the alternative, which is letting private companies rape everyone. Are you familiar with the privatization of water in Bolivia? It wasn't good. I haven't seen Bolivia pissing off trading partners.  And Morales *is* improving infrastructure. What do you mean "he should favor everyone, not just the poor"? This is the poorest country in the hemisphere except for Haiti.
Aerosmith - I Don't Want to Miss a Thing
Communicate everything you know for sure that your partner doesn't know, and you would think is important to her.
does it work if you've already been to the site, and you set it to File &gt; Work offline?
Ishmael by Daniel Quinn
I avoided Myspace pretty well. Glad it's finally dying.   Oh god, I just read all that shit you wrote about money. Sounds like something written by someone without a lot of money. Some people like that do make money, but you don't need to be like that at all. Really. And I don't think I have ever gotten a girl referencing jobs or anything. It would be a turnoff if she like that to be honest. I don't want a girl like that.
I am disappointed.  I made it a week, and the story was still non-existent.  Glad I didn't actually spend a week waiting for each next installment -- I'd want my money back!  -------  Edit: Hahahaha... comment on 'episode' 10 -- "Just WOW.  Amazing. brain shutting down because artwork **and story** so awesome."
...you're probably right
Right [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/963su/anyone_want_to_have_a_karma_party/c0bjsm5)
I don't get where exactly pan-Turkic and pan-Islamist sentiment overlap. Turkey's military is heavily anti-Islamist, while its populist government is more favorable to such things (the military and the academic/economic elites have tried banning the Islamists, even whilst they were in power).  So are all the Turkish elements involved non-military? So what the hell is the Turkish military doing? Our real NATO ally? Are they okay with their NATO buddies (the US primarily) in bed with their civilian, pro-Islamist, corrupt political rivals? Using their country's intelligence resources to wage proxy wars in Central Asia?
I thought so too.  I am bit surprised it has not received very many upvotes.
If that would have been a black kid with that white mom the camera man and the woman would have had happy hour at the White House.
we built this city -jefferson airplane  edit: a downmod? really? am i wrong? am i not actually in love with this shitty song? well thanks for letting me know.
Did u stay at club ambiance?
BAM, average GUI interface.
When your computer is showing your download speed while downloading a file, it is generally measured in kilobytes or megabytes per second; ISPs measure download speeds in kilobits or megabits.  700 megabytes per second is 5.4 megabits per second.  if it peaks occasionally at around 1 megabyte per second, then you are hitting just around 10 megabits per second; this is roughly equivalent to what speedtest.net is telling you (~10mbps).  watch the `b`; lowercase is bits, uppercase is bytes. there are eight bits in a byte.
I'm a fan of this one. You could say that I'm an enthusiast. It has all the awesome of the Double Narwhal, but with the addition of a fundamental trademark of reddit, the envelope. 
Ender's game is good. Just... don't let yourself be tempted by the sequels to Ender's Game. The first sequel is okay, though not nearly as good, but after that they go very rapidly downhill into a ridiculous land of new age magic and soul-beings floating around like faeries.  Also, [keep in mind the author's political views in real life, I feel, are pretty repulsive](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Orson_Scott_Card#Personal_views). YMMV.
Logic is a man made concept and only found useful when nature has been abandoned.
This type of automated generation is inspiring and I may copy it for fun.
Heat and Nitinol wire.
I don't think you think what it means what I think it means either.  But I think it means:  &gt; * sympathize: be understanding of; "You don't need to explain--I understand!"   I just happen to be right and you happen to be wrong.  That's all.
A long time ago, one of my dad's friends had a bee in his beer. The bee stung his throat somewhere, and his throat swelled up so badly that he had to be hospitalized. Thankfully he survived and is alive and well.
If you do click that, hold return and cmd-w and it will escape it.  Of course I clicked it after reading loads of warnings.
Well generally for JSON if it won't parse then it's not well-formed and unfortunately (for the "parsers" I've come across for JSON) they don't tell where the problem is...  Certainly in javascript it generally just does "eval" which is a pain...  As to whether it's valid, never come across anything but I've never found DTDs that useful anyway...  xml schema seemed to have promise but doesn't seem to have picked up traction...
Okay, upmodded and conceded. 
Possibly because it only has 16.  Man, I long for the days where windows could run in under 16mb AND play games at the same time.
He's more an asshole on the American versions, so it might just be Fox wants drama. He's nice(er) in the Brit versions, caring too when he does a segment with his children.
lol
I remember seeing another story about a Japanese maple being mistaken for weed:   http://stopthedrugwar.org/chronicle_blog/2008/feb/04/a_cop_is_dead_because_an_informa
I just want to tell you both "Good luck."  We're all counting on you.
I know that this wasn't the point of your post, but it is usually called a 'green-stick' fracture. It is called this because the bone looks like what happens when you snap a living branch off a tree. Like [this](http://picasaweb.google.com/lh/photo/Pj7KjQu0y-DE5ysVQ6FAQA)
Wow that's beautiful!! One of the main reasons I went to Europe was for the castles and I specifically booked in the Czech Republic to do so! I didn't get to any castles in Amsterdam :( Due to my ignorance.   I am sure some googling will bring the name of this place to our attention... very cool. 
When I was in Italy (about 19 at the time), I was crossing a bridge probably about 15 feet wide.  The entire bridge was taken up by old wop bitches all with their arms intertwined as ancient Southern European women are wont to do.   There were at least six of them.   They saw me coming but did not make any accommodation for me.  I got as far on the side of the bridge as I could without turning sideways, but they still didn't give me any space.   So I just ran right into one of the bitches.   Her entire gaggle began cursing me in Italian, "maleducato", etc.   I didn't give a fuck.  To me, they were the rude ones. And no, these weren't 100 year old women, they were in their sixties, definitely young enough to give a young nigger his space.  The best part was when some Italian youths about my age called to me right afterwards.   They had seen the whole thing.   I thought they were going to try to get on me about disrespecting the old birds, but they just asked for a smoke!
How long has this been going on? Maybe you just need to take a weekend off and relax.
The video claims he signed a statement saying he "may have" had the marijuana in his pocket. Cops have a long history of coercing such statements out of people though, so I don't think it carries much weight.  They also claim that [this was the button](http://imgur.com/LgUZY.jpg) he reached into his pocket to press, which seems weird, because that button appears to me to be mounted on something. Maybe it's just a weird design though.  But the main reason I doubt the cop's story is that it just doesn't match up with the video. It's not a great quality video, granted, but he definitely appears to dig around and then pull something out of his own pocket. It does not look like someone pushing a button on a little remote. Then, when he "searches" Ferrel's pocket, he finds the weed so quickly that it doesn't actually look like he even bothered to reach in. How is it, then, that they were unable to find it in the numerous preceding searches?  Fishy as hell.
What friggen bullshit. The US is one of the biggest importers of doctors. You should see all those Southern and fly over state hospitals going to Canada trying to recruit recent medical school graduates to practice in the States.  Lots of those foreign doctors would love to go to the states, the pay is a lot better. However, a lot of South Asian Muslims go to the UK because there already is a big community of South Asian Muslims, and it helps with relocating to a new country.  As for a foreign trained doctor practicing in Ontario. You might have to wait years, if ever to get a chance to practice here. It's sad to see so many foreign trained doctors doing manual labour because our medical association is overly rigid.
You don't quite have this feature in Objective-C (though up until Leopard we did have this similarly-purposed +poseAsClass: method, which would swap classes at runtime).  You can, however, change the class identity of an object at runtime.  So if you have a reference `aReference` to an object of type `AClass`, you can dynamically create a subclass of `AClass` (we'll call it `$AClass`) and change `aReference` class to this class.  It's a subclass because you don't want to screw up the ivar layout.  Now `$AClass` can override whatever `AClass` methods it wants!
So there's a name for the nod that I use to get flags to my cab.  Let me add this to my list of things about myself that I thought were special but really aren't so special.
They all seem to hesitate for at least half a second first too. The one guy looks around a bit and goes back a second time for a firmer grab.
Nope. Sorry. Obvious.
Don't you mean pedant?  **Edit**: Don't you mean fixed spelling error?
When your society makes enough to keep everyone healthy, definitely.
Apostrophe: Holy shit! An 's' is coming!
Leaded gasoline engines can use unleaded gasoline just fine; the same doesn't hold vice versa. 
My dentist talks to me before he puts a bunch of hooks and things in my mouth.  It's better that way.
&gt; I already did. You said NIST came up with the  &gt; pancake collapse idea. You were wrong. FEMA did  No, I didn't.  I said they relied on it to avoid investigating the mechanics of collapse following initialization, which is correct, and well-known.  And FEMA did not come up with the pancake collapse theory, Bazant and Zhao did.  Didn't we already have this discussion, as well?  &gt; your ignorance is incredible. Go read the NIST reports. You have alot to learn.  The blowhard award still belongs to you.
We are in your house right now.
Definitely. So long as the differences are scientific. Cultural differences are more important to recognize though.
*The Transplants* whole [debut album](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Transplants_(album)) is gold.  Everyone I know hated it when it first came out, but we all ended up secretly listening to it and loving it, like a guilty pleasure.  Their single "Diamonds and Guns" is the song from the Garnier commercials that goes "woo woo".  Tall Cans in the Air Lemme See 'Em Fuck You!
Thanks for expanding both of you. Good to know. 
**Fuck engadget** for glorifying this submission and torture device!
Hooray....maybe I'll be able to send my kid peanut butter with his lunch soon.
Or if you need it all the time, it could mean you have a medical issue.
Wonder how "snark about nothing" will play in the new, fascist America.
Oh yeah?  What about: I've had it with this game! I'm going for a scuttle!
That link was da bomb!
I know what you mean, but at some point don't you think they're misrepresenting what the human body looks like? People have a lot of weird body image issues as a result of photography, and Photoshop just magnifies the effect.
Meh, physics is usually introduced poorly in school.  They want to offer it without a calculus prereq, but calculus is pretty essential to understanding physics, so physics without calc is just a waste of everyone's time, the instructor included.
It's similar to surface waves that you see in water. Gravity pulling on the different densities in the atmosphere. [Here](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gravity_wave)
&gt;They say that if you can modify your own phone -- as in, if you install an application from anyone but Apple -- you might deliberately bring down the whole cell network or make anonymous phone calls to arrange drug deals.  it's ironic that apple was founded using money steve wozniak and steve jobs obtained by selling [blue boxes.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Blue_box)
Besides, children and the elderly are the targeted demographic for flu shots. It makes sense to target them specifically in trials.
Redditors the health care lobbyists who patrol this board are downvoting this.  REMEMBER TO UPVOTE the topic to counter the paid downvoters who want to bury it.
The clank heard round the world.
Something I don't like about reddit: This person is being downmodded because people don't agree with what he is saying. They should only be downmodding if his comment does not add to the discussion. His comment adds plenty to the discussion because now I can see all the great responses debunking his bunk-ass claims. But if I hadn't clicked his below threshold comment I would never have seen them.
Carbonite Quest [mapping features are sweet] perl frames [to see my friends targets] deadly boss mods [raid necessity] dominos [easy hot key binding and allows moving bars anywhere] atlas [know your way around instances] atlas loot [know what instances you need to run to get your gear] auctioneer [know what an item is worth]
Do you see breasts or a butt?
[Reminds me](http://www.bash.org/?364782):  &gt;  &lt;Pahalial&gt; "ignorance more frequently begets confidence than does knowledge" - Charles Darwin &gt;  &lt;kionix&gt; wtf? begets isn't a word. quit trying to make up words, fuckface.
Do you want to fight?
Interesting story, too bad your headline is whack!
Boring? Hardly. I can't disagree on the repetition, but I never expect to have my life changed by his books. If I want to be thoroughly entertained, he's a safe bet. I never meant to imply it was ground-breaking literature.
jslint and a steady hand
&gt;Are you saying that analog will continue to be supported on Comcast's cable?  No sure where you are getting these *are you saying* comments from.  Anyways looking around I see that indeed I was likely wrong. I'd honestly consider satellite if I didn't want a cable box in the first place and one was being forced on me if I wanted to continue service.  http://www.dslreports.com/forum/r22653344-Comcast-Chicago-Suburbs-Going-All-Digitail-92909
Right now, this is a case of Retarded Republicans disrupting town hall meetings of the congressman they didn't vote for in the first place.  But if the Democrats fuck up healthcare (and it looks like they probably will), they'll have more than just tea-baggers pissed off at them.
Only my pubes are red. I have very sensitive testicles.
Deal, I'll give you the 'fro for the football helmet.
You have not met the wrath of the anti-birthers, but you will.
thats why man invented rooms with doors
As has been said, one of the last true legends. Always seemed like a genuinely nice fellow, and always conducted himself with class. They don't make 'em like that anymore. RIP Sir Bobby.
Redditors the health care lobbyists who patrol this board are downvoting this.  REMEMBER TO UPVOTE the topic to counter the paid downvoters who want to bury it.
There is another video available on youtube featuring JC preparing chocolate cake, mashed potatoes and steak diana table side in a chaffing dish. 
I don't care. I'm chugging down a bottle and hitting random rave parties tonight.
I meant in general I want kiddie gamers off of my xbox live matches.
I'm fine with this as well
Maybe so, but then again it could be for other vanity plates too i guess. Either that or posts about spotting us driving around. I don't know.
http://exoptica.com/nothing1.html
is it just me or are there more important things to be doing?
There are a LOT of cars over 10 years old out there, and it is hard to tell how bad of shape they are in, because a lot of the pollution is invisible.
I know that falling matter in a vacuum has a max velocity or a free fall speed.   I cannot picture 2 buildings collapsing unevenly reaching near free fall speed.  Maybe if one of the buildings collapsed in its foot print, at near free fall speed I would believe it.  Yet 2?   No way  oh wait the third building that was unevenly burning and it too collapsed in near free fall speed.  Hmmm.  I don't have lbs of facts like donh but I aint gonna fall for your debunking bull.
Absolutely my favorite movie of all time.
ummm, i'm sure that the secret service would be more interested in the whois lookup.... * contact:   ZONER-2008717010 org:    Ronny Lawson name:   Ronny Lawson address:   1600 Pennsylvania Avenue NW address:   Washington address:   20500 address:   US phone:  +1.9715338273 e-mail:    ronnylawson@gmail.com registrar: REG-ZONER created:   17.07.2008 00:10:32 *
spam
Useless. China, India, Africa and South America are not included. And comparing since 2006 is not very informative.
And [Re: Anti-Sec - We have Terminated Blackhat-forums. Are you scared now HackForums?](http://seclists.org/fulldisclosure/2009/Jul/0233.html) is another webpage containing a posting suppsedly from Ronny Lawson.
...so do you want me to submit here or there?
Oh man I know someone who does that. It's really annoying &gt;.&lt;
&gt; If you can't afford your healthcare, you can get a loan.  Right.  82 year old grandma needs a hip replaced for $20K.  Someone's going to lend her money, because she'll, like, be paying that loan off real soon.  I take it that you'll be at the head of the line for lending her the money?
Don't be surprised if a girl claims you coerced her into sex and therefore raped her by using this method.
Actually that was a Voight-Kampff test. I think you passed, though?
I walk to work, I'm lucky, yet I think this is a very silly idea. Train fairs are stupidly expensive, the guys i work with who live afar can't move near to their place of work, because jobs just are not for life anymore, not to mention my city is pretty shitty!   Taxing the workers is fine as long as the workers get something out of it, seems (local) trams are not really a great deal. 
If it was ok with kn0thing, I would be completely okay with this.  My wallet would cry more than I did in Jurassic Bark.
Thanks. I couldn't relate the name with the game, I've played that before.  Good thing I have gary's mod :)
I love how the 'Southern Ontario' goes all the way up to the extremes of northern-ontario-nothing-fucking-here (coming from a person who spent 18 god aweful years up there)
So the carrier wins either way! Muahahaha!
&gt;I don't see how a totalitarian regime like China can continue to exist in it's current form as the tools of free communication become more and more available. Time will tell.  Perhaps I'm too pessimistic, but aren't those tools more freely available *outside* of China? I doubt the PRC allows much leeway in that regard. Though my hope is that they are forced to, if they wish to remain or even become relevant in the modern world.
Ohhh.  Gotcha.   I have a fear of bugs &amp; spiders, too, but I always make my poor husband catch them and take them outside (especially spiders) when he'd rather smash 'em and be done with them :)
What do you listen to while driving?
Maybe it's the immensity of this story that I hoped was coming all along, or maybe it's just talent by way of the author, but either way, 21 pages to the end of the book, I am more than satisfied.
Measure twice, cut once
Ok, I had to edit this.  I feel for you being a self-designated "piece of shit".  Why? I am the same type of "piece of shit" as you.  I dropped out of college as well because it was boring and I was wasting 4 years that I could be working and gaining experience.  I too got laid off 2 years ago, but I took a hobby of mine (computer coding) and turned it into a business.  I feel your pain on the friends issue.  No, in a real political race I would shine the plebians on like no other.   Arrogance?  Only behind closed doors.  You see, it is very easy to get someone (read: average joe) to like you.  Simply tell them you are going to improve the quality of their life, and make an attempt at doing so.  Blammo, instant well-wisher for life.  That is all that people want out of life.....the ultimate goal......to improve their lot.  My mother pulls that "My IQ is 1 point higher than yours" bullshit.  Whilst she may be right....well, she probably is.   I know a bigger "piece of shit" in life than 100 of you and me's combined.  He is a wash of an attorney, but one of the smartest men I have ever encountered.  It gets to the point where I do more listening than talking when speaking with him.   People like that, I admire.  School me and you have my instant respect.
honestly, you probably should have lost your license, that cop should get put on unpaid leave for a while.
Date her, then tell me she isn't a Witch.
If a girl tries to bring up physics and the guy doesn't get it at all...Wow.
Um, dude...I hate to sound like a dick, but why in the name of the Flying Spaghetti Monster would you bring weed (any amount) back across the border?  Dogs or not, that's a retarded thing to do at *any* border crossing, much less a crossing in an area that's known for smuggling.  I know it sucks to waste herb, but jesus titty-fucking christ is it that hard to come by where you're from that you felt the need to smuggle $50 worth (if that) back home with you?  I'm trying really, really hard to have some sympathy for you, but damn...
Scaring people for your own agenda is just plain wrong. It's just offensive that you would do anything to screw people who have NO health care options. And NO THE LORD WILL NOT COME DOWN AND JUST FIX IT! So, we must fix it ourself, with the truth. Not, the rumors running around. What ever happened to Journalistic Integrity?  The truth shows as the truth. Have you read the 1000 page plus plan? I bet you have insurance don't you?
My dentist just found a cavity on the surface of one of my molars, my first in about 10 years (I'm 20). My pediatric dentist used to seal my molars regularly to prevent this so I asked my new dentist why he let that lapse. He said that after a certain age they stopped doing sealants.   The cynic in me wants to say that cavities are more profitable than periodic sealing, and I don't really trust this guy that much. What's your opinion? Is there an age limit to sealing?
He is implying that it went over your head.  And the angle they were referring to was undoubtedly the angle of insertion.
Those pictures made my penis grow hard
**No one ever thought that your post was more important because you put it in bold.**
If there were more submitters like you, the internet would be a much better place.
You can murder without intent in common law states. Even in statutory it's more than likely still second degree murder. 
Probably something to do with getting your cg closer to the explosion.
Yeah, that about sums it up.
Then why not give them highly radioactive jewellery?
And then you're back to the problem at hand: The wrong people want to be cops.
Truth can't change.  It's your statement that is changing when you change axioms.
Three'd
Well if birdflu666 reports it, that's good enough for me!  Who needs verified sources and corroborative evidence anyway.  The sky is falling!!
God damn scooters. This happens to me every day.
Yeah, that's why I posted the link.  I was happy with the formatting though and not just a lazy copy/paste.
According to [this stub](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sugar_crash) a sugar crash has never been scientifically observed.
Bulls that are bred for bullfighting are treated like kings, and are given a (small) chance to fight back. They live much better then cows that are raised to be eaten, who spend most of their life in a stall being fed substandard food. Not saying it's right, just that it's pretty much the best life a bull can have with the exception of, you know, actually living like a normal bull in the wild. 
I'm the one who posted the craigslist ad. and curious: How do programmers approach marketing? What do you think of marketing? What are the toughest marketing problems you have dealt with? And what would you want help with?
Isn't Toronto City Council 45 people? Did 7 people just not feel like voting?
Such bullshit.  Surely there are a million examples of this in popular music.
So...what was your point? You make a post with no actual content?
&gt;Selfishness is a big part of natural selection   Yes it is. Just like murder and rape.  the purpose of civilization is to rise above our natural tendency to kill, rape, steal, etc.  Unfortunately in many cases we have failed. Unfortunately in many cases mothers didn't teach their young not to rape, murder, steal. They never taught their kids the difference between right and wrong.  unfortunately these kids also went through the education system without learning the difference between right and wrong.  The end result is that we have people like you.  People who think any trait of mankind that is a part of "natural selection" is perfectly fine to codify into law.
Oooaaah ooooaaahh!!!  Throw your hands in da air! Fuck dat bear!  wa what??
Err... just personally, I'm big on personal liberty and freedoms. But I'd say these guys broke a social contract to the point of no return (and at least one of them had no interest in returning). If I had a kid with no supervision on a playground and had to choose one of these guys or a loaded gun to be out there with them, there's a good chance I'd pick the gun.  I hate saying it as a left-leaning guy, but I'd go so far as to consider repeat offense rape a capital crime. Because at that point the best you can do is to NOT ruin a kid's life, and the worst is, well... worse. So, yeah, high risk and repeat offenders don't get much sympathy from me.  EDIT: And we didn't punish people for displaying sexuality. They were pretty much on probation when they got to us. Like all people on probation, they had a lot more to prove. And, yeah, I probably couldn't go years without any type of pornography either.
never would have guessed, anthropology_nerd
&gt;Which raises the question: Why, in this country, is it always the religious right that won't take anything on faith?  pretty good question  edit:  not trying to toss you in with the religious right
Yet it was never in an accident! (cue dramatic music)
You only need *two* spaces at the end of a line to force a line break afterwards.   Not four.   See?  But yes, double line-breaks are much nicer and easier to read (including while you're in the edit box), while still being fairly compact.  I recommend using that strategy instead.
[This seems oddly appropriate for this thread.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UTby_e4-Rhg)
"I don't like sand. It's coarse and rough and irritating, and it gets everywhere."
Official? Was there a proclamation and I missed it?
That the lid on a toilet seat has a purpose.   It's a no-brainer. Put the lid down before you flush.
Unicorns have balls.
As far as fixing up the house, only one time, which was the first house.  It needed a new kitchen.  My father (who has in the past been a carpenter and general handyman) was more than happy to help me out.  I didn't buy a 'new' kitchen set for it, but installed one which had been taken out of another house who had redone theirs.  It didn't look bad or out of place.  Putting in this kitchen was actually one of my favorite memories.  My father and i have not really had much 'bonding' over the years and it was good.  I could see he enjoyed it aswell, teaching his son who had been an academic how to do some of his skills.
&gt;The card should be launching later this year for somewhere around $895, though the price is subject to change.  That price better be subject to BIG changes like -700 dollars worth. How long have they toyed with a PCI cards with desktop ram or tother ram etc as a harddrive? Four years at least. Put up or SHUT UP
Forgive me for the lingo. I don't normally talk like this. * Me: Hey so i wuz gonna ask if i could tap that  * Her: Tap me?  * Me: yeah womang  * Her: Wow im flattered... But y does everybody come to me for sex? Lmao That was a shocker... but it continued. * Me: Comon bby dont taunt me like dat  * Her: Lmao this sooo doesnt sound like u. Who died and made me village whore?  * Me: Das a guud quessin 'n all but when u gonn be avaliable  * Her: Any time? Just ocme down. And ur talking funny. R u drunk?  * Me: Naw bby im not drunk. Wat ur address sweet thang  * Her: &lt;address&gt; EDIT: This just in.  * Her: So wwhen u come down? Im gettin excited Lmao Thanks reddit; brb laid.
Word word balls up.  i used to used them, they were cool. but now i just use a spare box that i wouldn't mind getting messed up.
Where does it say its a temp of 130 on there,  im calling bullshit.
Thank you for the laugh 
You probably spend more time complaining about other people not doing it than the time it takes to just do it yourself.
land cow?  in california we just call them cows.
Very true.   Mine is: *if at first you don't succeed, redefine success*   That works for many things, but absolutely fails for dating.
Anybody who buys Rebiya Kadeer's story has to seriously have their head examined. 10,000 people is equivalent to 1/9th of the capacity of Wembley stadium vanishing into thin air. Under the noses of foreign reporters. A typical coach can carry about 50 people. It would require 200 coaches to converge on Urumqi to pick up 10,000 people in order to vanish them away. All unnoticed by foreign reporters. Just how likely is that? Even if they weren't carted away and were somehow vanished inside Urumqi you'd still require a sizable movement of people towards specific holding areas. Not one single allegation of Kadeer's has been substantiated by foreign media. You'd have to be really gullible to buy into her story. Then of course we also have the latest revelation from Sibel Edmonds (a former FBI translator, and gagged by the US authorities) that the CIA trained and sent former AQ and Uighur in Afghanistan back into China. She seems to forget to mention this minor detail.
&gt;The police are not your friends. FTFY.
When are you gonna let me tap dat?
Stumbled accross a wallet, found $60 blowing around it and returned it all to the original owner a block away.  Then raped her.
It's up to you :)
RIP Sir Bobby, you'll be missed.  Great to see his pic up there.
This.
ok, this one i acquired from another redditor and it has changed my life and the lives of those i've shared it with:  "If you put a small amount of toilet paper in the bowl before you take a dump, it will not splash." 
And you are deaf.
I personally know a man whos daugther was in American Idol top 4th. I hear nothing about this at all.  
This is my favourite version of the [song.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Pw8sNoodIDk) :)  *Now when I listen to a really good song, I start nodding my head, like I'm saying 'yeeess' to every beat. Yes, yes, yes, this rocks. And then sometimes I switch it up like, No, no, no! Don't stop a-rockin'*
Ah, [Ultimate](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Ultimate_frisbee)
Actually, unpaid internships are (mostly) [illegal](http://laborlaw.typepad.com/labor_and_employment_law_/2007/11/unpaid-internsh.html) in the US.  *Edit: Added the word mostly*
Is this stuff available online? Is it only public domain stuff or is it anything ever broadcast?
I don't think Belkin makes phones.  Although they do make iPhone accessories:  http://www.belkin.com/ipod/iphone/
Subscribed.  I don't really have anything to sell, but this could be very cool.
And to add to the horrible realizations that people really do suck, you usually run into management within your agency that is even more jaded than you. These people make an already shitty job much worse, either by not giving a shit (therefore you have to do more work) or being sadistic to amuse themselves.
That's 3 buildings, not 2, and wtc-7 did actually achieve freefall.  1&amp;2 fell short of freefall acceleration by between 10-30%, depending on whose notion of begin/end of the event you'd like to accept.  (Oh, well, 60%, if you are willing to listen to NIST's early utter drivel.)  That it accelerated at all is the question worth asking, as has been recently pointed up by NIST backpeddling, and which has been pretty skillfully deflected by the freefall question for a decade.
love the music!!!
If you've ever done desktop/phone support, think of your worst, most annoying, idiotic calls.  Cops deal with people just like that and worse all day long, except they're even more emotionally distressed than "my Microsoft isn't working".
I just saw a segment on Penn and Teller's show Bullshit! about polygraph machines and apparently you can false positive on every question just by learning how to properly clench your asshole.
*"This isn't for your sake; it's for the sake of the next generation."*   Oh fuck you and your self-indulgent parading of caring about the next generation. I mean, seriously, if you REALLY CARED about the next generation, you'd actually be doing something right now, *not sitting online debating this useless crap.*   When I look at your statement again and again, I read it in Glenn Beck's voice imagining he's crying.
I got "too many connections from your IP."  This might mean that a lot of people at my office are browsing Reddit.  In any case, I have absolutely no idea what this site is or what I am supposed to find amusing.  Please advise.
&gt;These little 15-second waits add up--bigtime. If Verizon's 70 million customers leave or check messages twice a weekday, Verizon rakes in about $620 million a year.   holy fuck i had no idea those little things added up like this
Really? The black people around me are idiots, its the Asians around me that are all really smart.  Though, they're not as bad as the homosexuals around me, who are all trying to rip apart the moral fabric of this fine nation.  That's just the ones I know though.
Good article, bad agenda driven headline.  EDIT: So you immediately down-vote when I point this out, you worm. You sign up 4 hours ago spoofing a well known *reddit* member log-on name so you can spread your effluent around reddit while burning a legitimate member of the community. Such class, such pitiful cowardice, grow up you Megaphone whore.
Seriously.... Dumisani Rebombo is a former rapist who now speaks openly and with great remorse about his crime.  Former rapist? WTF?
Told you guys God made everything for a reason. ( *raspberry* )  */sarcasm*
Doesn't look that bad to me.  Hell if his older brother had been doing it he'd probably be laughing and having a great time.  I know if I'd laid down and refused to move like a little shit I would have gotten a hell of a lot worse than being dragged around on a leash.
You just blew my fucking mind.
I have to ask: why would they forge letters from the NAACP?  Does the NAACP typically get involved with bills unrelated to civil rights?
"sorted by: hot"
Oh, if only the girl in front her was doing the same thing. :(
Nearly a month. Then I left.
Oh, man.  I looooove wome with husky/throaty,*real* woman voices.  But I like Bjork's singing, and cannot stand females who do not know the difference between talking out of your nose versus out of your mouth. You know the type, don't you?  The ones who grew up whining to get things, and the parents never recognized they were creating an aural devastator.
It's a yoga maneuver...
These comics are drawn from dreams, that's why they are so absurd.
It's a pilonidal cyst.  I had one excised and had to lay on my side for two weeks while the gaping hole tried to heal up.  I couldn't even roll over.  That *sucked*.
&gt;a) our care isn't free. we pay for it with much higher taxes and diminished national security.  It's more like a really cheap all you can eat buffet, but for health care.
Your knowledge of the genre is impressive. Your argument is not: doesn’t it basically boil down to “no innovation, please”? Shoot 'em up is definitely a time-honored genre that really hasn’t changed all that much. Isn’t that an argument for some long-overdue experimentation?
No regrets
I thought it was bruteforce..
it takes less sun to give them skin cancer
How does it get done faster? You still have to sweep the floor? Yes I used to do this when I worked in a "shop" of sorts.  Now I clean the counter tops and put the refuse in the trash so I DON'T have to clean the floor.
I agree. 
High Colonic. jes sayin'
Fuck his flappy man tits.
how much are you willing to kick back to my reelection campaign fund?
It took me a while but I think I have cracked the secret code:   *What the fuck? You racists should come and debate with me, I can show you what islam really is.*  I think that's right. Clearly 'what islam is', is not about spelling.
name calling. truthers, birthers, etc. etc  No good points just name calling.  Cant even argue against the facts.
I always read that as quit fucking trolling before I remember that the young'uns gave it a new meaning.
Why on earth would you visit the south, but not the Pacific NW?
WHAR?
If [this story](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/FedEx_Flight_705) is any indication, there's pretty much nothing you can do if FedEx pilots/flight crew decide you looked at them funny. They are *that* hardcore.
The need for, and daily use of, small talk.
Oh, here we go again.  It's not a source of energy because the amount of energy he's using to electrolyze water in an oddball way is more than the energy released when the Hydrogen and Oxygen combust.  And since the two gasses combust immediately, he's not able to store the Hydrogen for later use in a vehicle. It's a pointless excercise, a light show for the gullible.
&gt;Cantor, you got it all together, you might have just forgot where you put it.  Ha! My Dad would have said:  &gt;He couldn't find his ass with both hands.
Hopefully that pussy will never be Mayor again.
How can you deduce that; by their spelling of 'freaks'? Clearly, their sarcastic tone to the conformist music industry is above all our heads.
And only while Samuel Jackson hasn't had it with them.
did you speak in a clear, slow voice?
I once went back to work before fully recovering from a busted back.  After watching me writhe in pain while trying to walk, the self-proclaimed resident grandmother ordered that I sit down while she held a pack of ice down the back of my pants, against the injury.  If I were less distracted by the pain I might have thought it vaguely bizarre but at the time I really didn't care.
Beer.  Also, the amount of wrapping paper required to appropriately cover a box. (even though I'm excellent at directions and most spatial orientation puzzles)  Also, hamburgers.
&gt; the FBI will send you "directly to jail, don't pass through go" Assuming the US government were actually controlled by all Americans rather than, say, the wealthy heads of the federal reserve, then the FBI wouldn't be doing that.  But since we all know the government is really ruled by a tiny propertied class, the obvious solution, of course, would be to overthrow capitalism. Your average employee of the FBI isn't any more a member of the capitalist class than anybody else in the country.  The more people that are willing to defend themselves and eachother against the capitalist class, the less of a threat they become.
I'd like to sell [this](http://www.reddit.com/r/store/comments/96hoj/sculpturelike_light_thing_atlanta_area/).   I've got other art to sell if anyone is interested.
[Good News Everyone!](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=1D1cap6yETA)
Take that Java programmers!
lol
http://www.eecs.berkeley.edu/~lmeyerov/projects/pbrowser/  January 2009.
like /r/yardsale?
An ant and me aren't made of steel.
He'd pity the foo who couldn't reconstruct the A-Team van out of a beer stein and a band aid.  Then Mr. T would punch him right in the dickhole.
Note that the article is all about how slutty women are so that you can't trust them to form a stable marriage. The author appears to overlook the fact that you can just replace 'she' with 'he' and you have exactly the same story.
Well, I'm not really a birther. I really don't give a shit.  As far as I'm concerned, the govt is usurped from the top down, and every last one of them is corrupt. So fuck it.
GOOD ANSWER. 
&gt; Ok, so any type of substance, bomb whatever to blow up the world trade center.. that isn't plausible?  Thermite is completely ridiculous and implausible for a myriad of reasons.  Bombs are a different story. Bombs are a plausible way to demolish a building... but they are implausible as the primary mechanism due a huge variety of evidence. There's no reason to seriously consider them.  Most importantly, NIST showed the building needed no help to fall, so all of these extra hypotheses are unnecessary. There is 0 evidence for any of them, and they are not needed, so occam's razor seals the deal.  &gt; You can avoid this question, but until you answer it you and NIST are losing credibility, not gaining it.  Avoided it? I couldn't be more clear:  _I am saying that a thermite-based collapse of the WTC is completely implausible, yes. People carrying in enough of it, and being able to put it in the right places, w/o anyone noticing, and then collapse the building, consistent with the evidence, is so hilariously and ridiculous implausible to not even be seriously considered. Yes._  The only one avoiding questions is you. You think NIST should disprove every single retarded theory anyone can imagine.   Try to dodge this for the seventh time: if a new investigation came out that didn't disprove leprechauns, would you be using the same dumbass logic to claim it was unscientific? 
rush limbaugh earned the wrath of jon stewart long ago
There is no point in discussing this topic with you. You are steeped in apologetic nonsense.
Well I guess the good news is that a lot of democrats don't think he's a christian, and they're ok with that...
Created: 2009-01-10 00:08:43  Modified: 2009-01-10 00:08:43  Well, that's what the document properties say. It also says Leo Meyerovich is the author and since he's also listed in the document itself I guess the date is accurate.
I guess we're missing why trolling is fun.
Sandals, Montego Bay.  
As long as you have some coordination, it's not really chaotic. A friend of mine used to run scouts night, and we once had 8v8 scouts. It was good fun. 
So I loved this song when I first heard it (thanks to this post) but wasn't really feeling the album...4th listen just now and it's a pretty good album.  Thanks for the suggestion.
Doctors are very Skilled in Diagnosing and Treating Problems of the Mind.
taxes
To-may-yo, to-mah-to. 
The founding fathers wrote many things and they didn't all agree even with themselves at times.   The founding fathers were clear.. WE the People have the power in the US. We are not a nation that was to be founded upon static principles, we are a nation that changes as society changes.   So, if the American people want more socialism or collectivism as you like to call it then that is there right above an beyond any founding principle..  And get real, you pampered little ass doesn't have a single moral or physical similarity to the founding fathers. They grew up in a time of great oppression and the result was that didn't trust any existing government, they didn't trust the wealth and many of them didn't trust the church either. Democracy is ever changing and that's a principle you need to come to terms with.   Our founding fathers are not gods, they are just guys who were oppressed, but still educated, and their solution to oppression was to hand the most power to the people any government ever had at that time.   You're always taxing one group more than another because incomes are always changing. The only remotely fair way to tax is via proportion. A flat tax means the middle class tax burden would skyrocket and the rich tax burden would fall ever lower than it is now. The burden of taxes on the rich are very low among the lowest we've had since the 1920s. I'm willing to go as far as saying it's no coincidence every time we have low taxes on the rich we have corrupt business practices and the decline of personal wealth in the working classes. You are selling out small business by not taxing the wealth as much as the middle class.  Practice what you preach and ask for a proportional tax instead of a progressive tax... but understand a progressive tax is superior especially in times of great crisis like WW2 or the Great Depression.  Occasionally everything we stand for is threatened and we need money to fight those threats. Raising taxes on the top income brackets is the common solution and it hasn't hurt the nation yet. Rather lowering taxes on the top income brackets is followed by banking crashes and economic disasters.   At the very least everyone should pay a more equal proportion of their income, however you cannot make a flat tax work. You'll be externalizing corporate costs onto the middle class even more. We'll pay for their roads while they send tractor trailer after tractor trailer to ship consumables all around the nation.   No, a flat tax will not work, it must be proportional. The word is uniform.. not equal or the same. Uniform means having the same form.   Plus doesn't that mean states would have to all charge the same exact tax as well.. regardless of income. Would you tell people from Mississauga they have to pay the same exact taxes as people from California while you argue for individual freedoms ?
We need to design Reddit T-shirts that expose maximum cleavage.
It's steam bent oak hardwood, oak plywood, maple and an alabaster lens.
Any mandatory healthcare plan is slavery.   If you would rather die than receive painful treatment for cancer, heart disease, or dementia, you shouldn't be forced at gunpoint to pay for others receiving such treatment.
Hmmm.  I think i may be getting an idea of where the other two books will be going.  It was said that the Amarantin had decades or centuries to prepare for the inevitable Onslaught, I can't see why that would change for humanity, who are far more advanced than the Amarantin ever were...
&gt;She has met the student before.  I'm sorry if, in your delusional state, this constitutes proof. But it does not. Try again.
Chasm City was the first novel of his that I read...It fucked with my mind and I fucking loved it.
If can read, then you should be smart enough to take your kid to a fucking doctor.
The bailout caused the bonuses. There would be none if there wasn't a bailout. Here is an analogy. Let's say Major League Baseball hands out a Bailout to all the worst teams in the a league. You can bet, these people are going to start bidding on other player to entice them to play for them with outrageous salaries. Instead of the better teams letting their players go, they simply up their player salaries with bonuses so they can keep them. This is exactly what is happening, except all the teams got bailouts and they are all trying to out bid each other with our money.
What I'm talking about, mostly.
&gt; How can there be one god if a million people believe in a million different versions of it?  There can be. Maybe there is one god, and he doesn't care at all what people believe.
 I've been using JP101 off and on for about two and a half years now, they're great, and the online tools are worth subscribing to, as well... a great resource.
actually, given the general level of incompetence in government, I would sort of expect that...
I agree with what you are saying, and dont think I'm trying to deflect the conversation from women. I'm just trying to say that it's more complex than simply saying women are underprivileged. And I think you understand that too.   I think we need to worry more about what is wrong with societal norms and which ones are harmful and how we can fix them.   The way some feminists talk about it the conversation becomes polarized and the trolls instantly come flying out. Feminism should be about equality for everyone, regardless of race, creed, gender, sex, or sexual preference.
She's got 2 semesters to go until she has her degree in Sociology. I'm fairly confident she wouldn't do that kind of thing (sucking cock for 20's) because she's pretty adamant about being a 'one man' woman.
If Arcade Fire were to be a CSI, MGMT would be NCIS.
Go single payer so single payer.. it's your birthday.
communicating: I had a rough day at work (then elaborate bit by bit as you're pressed further for info)  whiny naggy SO: so and so did such and such and isn't that unfair because i'm really a good person so why do they have to act like that and what should I do about it but stop trying to solve my problems because all I wanted was someone to listen and sympathize?  Edit: I should mention that neither my husband nor I act like the second example, but plenty of my friends do and then wonder why they're not as happy as I am.  Also: the occasional rant is fine! Just not day after day after day.
Yep. Some one with balls needs to do a Joseph Welch type admonishment on Fox and the right wing crazies. I'd hoped Colin Powell would have the balls, but he hasnt called them out directly. The nutty right is too invested in their nut jobbery to back down now, and as you pointed out, it's getting worse.
Democracy, as such, is hardly the best solution. But as long as we have the inclination to force everyone to live under the same rules, I guess it is the best we can hope for with our current level of technology.
&gt;You can actually see a bag of weed? Could you freeze-frame it or something for me?  It's hard to say. The crappy compression and bad lighting make it hard to see the bag even after he "finds" it.  &gt;A source for some of my claims: http://www.wsmv.com/news/15370841/detail.html  I saw that further down in the thread after I replied to you, and it definitely casts some doubt on it. Still, how is it that he found the weed so quickly (it doesn't really even look like he puts his hand in the guy's pocket) when they hadn't found it before, despite repeated searches?  It just doesn't add up
Wtf is the chat it's going to now?
&lt;slaps forehead&gt;  *That's* the name!  I mean, they were no Sugar Ray, let alone Hootie and the Blowfish, but they *did* perform in the 90s.
If the government **were** planning some backroom deal to destroy private health insurance and transfer the entire country onto government-run healthcare, I'd be a very happy camper.  Unfortunately, that isn't the case.  PS: Presidents don't write bills, Presidents sign bills.  Congress writes bills, and rewrites them, over and over again...  There are something like 8 different outstanding versions of this legislation among both chambers of Congress.  So which version is this article referencing?
No, we are your family. You can leave whenever you want. Your kids will miss you of course.
edited
Should have killed it before it sprouted wings.
There's nothing libertarian about creating laws which force people to perform duties they have no choice in.
Forgive me for asking, I was a philosophy major; what's ray tracing?
Kids play "Hot Potato." Adults play "Rotten Potato."
I saw on the news the other day that GE wanted to bring manufacturing jobs back to America. You can have the Chinese, any many other Asian country citizens, do manufacturing work for you, but as a company owner you lose nearly all your control. I work for a big company that outsources lots of the work, and it's ridiculous how many things aren't going smoothly. Granted many of the workers don't have any experience with what we're working with, but they're given an SOP and completely ignore it. Disheartening as trying to save a dollar has nearly destroyed our economy and brought China into prosperity. 
Tell me why leprechauns are implausible, first, and then I'll tell you why thermite is implausible.
And this is a bad thing because...?
I'm actually going to go ahead and check my house, under my bed, and in my closets for stalkers like you!!!!!!  But seriously, Californians aren't from California. Everyone here is from somewhere else, like Texas. Or worse, like me, from Florida.  *gasp*
bawney fwank appwoves ::gavel::
Don't be greedy with the puns
Sorry, but you didn't address the question: Should sex offenders, who are at a high risk of offending again, be castrated?  The only alternatives that I see are classifying them as dangerous offenders, and locking them up for life, or euthanising them.
Haha! Reminds me of that one movie where dracula is dancing with a girl in a ballroom and everyone realizes he has no reflection from a giant mirror.  Anyone care to help me out the name of that? I can't quite remember at the moment. :-x
Learn how to roll a joint. 
I thought that too, and even said so in another thread. But there was no picture and no talk about how the balloon was over US soil and not in the border zone.  Shooting at US property over US land isn't cogent to Canadian/US relations.
Well... you'd think most people would use nails and a _hammer_ or a screwdriver and _screws_... but then I realized the table could consist _only_ of 8 nails and a screwdriver and no other materials.
No, but you can mark it good/bad, and possibly maybe they do something to try to make more good and less bad? :)  It also does this fancy shading thing where words that it's relatively certain about are black, and words that it's less certain about are progressively lighter shades of gray.
Measure twice, cut once.   Mostly because I'm building a deck right now.
&gt;Other than installing Linux, what do you guys suggest?  =(  Can't you take away the admin privileges though?  Just make her a normal user?  That should accomplish most of what you want.  She shouldn't be able to install a lot of program or (I think) modify system files.  I'm fairly certain the admin can even set up more restrictions on the user accounts.  This is definitely doable.
Don't have to be a fatty to act like one.  I just found out last weekend that I've gone under 150 lbs.  And this was about 24 hours after I'd eaten half a large pizza by myself.  D:
Are you talking about things such as Medicare Advantage plans?  These are private policies one can buy to bolster their coverage.  This is not medicare. The health insurance companies are spending millions and millions of dollars to ensure the status quo.  I think it is you who should do the cursory search. You are just talking out of your ass, man.  Profits?  Fuck profits. The profits in the health care insurance industry come from bankrupting our country. 
That's what Einstein thought when he said "God doesn't play dice with the universe" -- meaning that even though we can't predict quantum mechanics, there is still a straightforward kind of causality taking place beyond what we can observe.  It's my understanding, however (not a quantum physicist either), that ultimately it turns out that things do happen more or less literally randomly on the quantum scale, hence the story of Schroedinger's cat.  Quantum traits of tiny particles are do not have a state until they are observed, at which point they "randomly" (I think this happens according to a wave function or something, which isn't really random, more like a gradient of probabilities, but still not relating to anything casual) choose one.  And the Heisenberg uncertainty principle to which you are referring does not say that you can't tell the exact position when you are measuring the exact velocity, it means that the particle literally *does not have* an exact position when velocity is the thing being observed.  Whether or not any of this truly refutes determinism is a bigger philosophical argument than I am capable of making, though.
Thanks for pointing that out?
evolution
was IM'd this by a coworker today. laughed my ass right out of the chair.
Patented Spheres that are found in explosive grade thermite where found in steel samples from the 9/11 attacks.  I guess that does not mean it is thermite it is just a conspiracy.
His comment karma is at -107.
next craze perhaps yo junglist junglist?
I've got similar handouts before, though non-religious. A friend of mine with higher education in psychology said it is somewhat common for schizophrenics to distribute stuff like that during relapses. The one I got claimed that certain political leaders were hiding slaves in an underground tunnel, and one of them was informally known as "the butcher" in other circles.  They tend to string odd thoughts together in a nonsensical way, while other elements of the passage appear correct. It is often in a way that makes you re-read it several times, because it isn't immediately obvious that it is complete gibberish, and the vocabulary can be fairly advanced, which causes most people to give the benefit of the doubt that there is a rational thought that the reader is missing.  Stolen from a mailing list:  "It should be extrusively notated (and annotated) that my imago has been ensnared in the viscosity of time. That is why my transcendent self has been importuned (but not without resisting) despite the hydraulic pressure to limitate and delineate those theotons (the untimely microscopic, particulate hydrole) whose essential god-like characteristics have been laminated into an irreducibly minisculate, atomized, and indeed lionized cannister. Such is the enraptured entrapment of my condition."
I know it's a little cliche, but I use Aquamacs Emacs for editing Python code. But the Python code I write is/was usually no more than a handful of source files and approx. 1.5k LOC in total, so I'm not sure how it'll fare on bigger projects and what extensions there are out there to help you manage them.
Also Diamond Age. Equally engrossing views of the future, down completely different paths.
Actually you are.
&gt;A lot of those high costs are due to regulation--which is what he was saying.  Those regulations, I believe, are mostly about testing them, not so much developing them. Sure, one could argue that the fda kind of goes overboard on testing.  Some very good drugs are usable in Canada that aren't yet permitted in the USA, for example.  But it takes years to come up with a chemical compound that will do the job required without killing anyone.  That takes huge amounts of money.   That's an investment that the drug company won't get back if a competitor can legally release a cheap knockoff.  Without being able to recoup their investment, much less make a profit on a new drug, it would be financial nuts to bother coming up with new drugs.  This is exactly why rare diseases aren't as likely to see drugs to combat them.   They can't charge enough for the drugs they might discover for them to try to make them.  Edit: I believe there *are* viable drugs that the fda disapproved.  Drugs that would help some diseases, but the fda disapproved for various reasons.  But I can't recall any of them off the top of my head.  Edit2:  Here's a pdf with estimates of costs.  It was from 2003, but it's still useful. [http://www.cptech.org/ip/health/econ/dimasi2003.pdf](http://www.cptech.org/ip/health/econ/dimasi2003.pdf)  On page 162 is a table showing costs in 2003 dollars, from a drug from phase 1 to phase 4, when it goes to marketing.  
That's... interesting.  I was under the impression that no one -- guy or girl -- preferred condom sex to no-condom sex.  /shrug
Touche. Unfortunately, beer goggles work.
I lol'd at your lol.
I've seen those videos a hundred times, but they still crack me up.
Scary!!!!!!... Fear Fear Fear....Boogey Man....Fear Fear Fear....OOgaBooGa...Fear Fear....Orange Alert...Colors Scary..... That's all it is. And yeah, it's uses FreeRepublic as a source...LOL.
Hmm...I like boobs and I have several guitar picks. This is a tough one.
I probably will but I really want my bike back.
You lucky bastard!
NIST did not propose that the falling mass's acceleration increases through the fall. Again you prove you don't know what you are talking about. It's likely you don't even understand what "increasing acceleration" means.
O sea que ¿haces contabilidad? JAJAJAJA
Oh yea, drafts always work nicely....
I spent my time around friends like that, and have a few who still are into that stuff. The benefit is I'm well aware of her sexual past both from her and her friends. Holy hell is it crazy.  Edit: I'd say always wear a condom in general. I'm quite anal about that.
Be sure to paint your body with Tide detergent too.  That's shit's full of phosphorus and will make your whole body glow a faint blue  ;)
If the God of the Bible exists, he can go fuck himself.
Critical Mass are assholes. I am 100% in favor of cycling but you have to obey the traffic lights and other rules of the road.  Purposely causing traffic jams because they hate cars?  Fuck those selfish pricks.
oldie but goodie: http://www.fuckthesouth.com/
See, that's why I think Global Warning frenzy is a bit over the top. I think plenty of environmentalists cynically or wholeheartedly use Global Warming as the Boogie Man to get everyone else to go along with the Green agenda. The fact is that there are plenty of legit reasons to go Green without invoking global warming - especially since we don't know what effects global warming will have on the planet. Heck, it might be a net positive. It seems like hot, wet environments have more life than cold, dry ones. Which would you rather live in - a jungle or a glacier? I'm not sanguine that global warming would be great for the planet, but I think stories like this should help show the complexity and the difficulty of predicting the results of climate change on people or ecosystems.  - Aaron Dalton, Editor, http://1GreenProduct.com
might be considered normal... it *is* just sideboob
I forget how long an actual commercial is or was. Damn you tivo.
so? it was leaked why the fuck would they not blacklist it?
that was 10 mins of MOTHER FUCKEN WIN!
I met my daughter's mother online. We were both fans of an indie band in the late nineties. She lived on one side of the US and I was on the other. After months of chatting, emails and phone convo's we decided that she would move into my one bedroom apartment in a small town. She flies across country and we settle down. We do really well together and eventually get a house and decide to have a child.  2 years after our son is born she decides she doesn't want to be a mom and leaves us. I had to stay with my son and lost my job, my house and nearly everything I owned (I keep a small shed with the only crap I could save) . I ended up moving into a small room in my mother's house and spent most of the time trying to hold on to part time low paying jobs. I spent a year and a half if a terrible deppression. This past week I received an email saying that she doesn't want to see our son ever again and she is basically erasing us from her memory.
No
But with Jon Stewart I get laughs and insight.   With Glenn Beck all I get is angry and indigestion.
If you were in the same room as me I would smack you so hard in the back of the head.
When  I lived in Spain I took the entire series with me and read them from start to finish in just a couple of weeks (I had a LOT of free time). As soon as I finished the series, I picked up the  first one and started all over again. It's a great series, and the last two books particularly are incredible once you've read the rest.
DAMN YOU SPELLCHECK!!
That's quite the question.
Coffee is good
It's okay for a Christian to marry a non-theist.
It makes no sense that the fines are so huge they are unpayable.  If they were fining people 20k, a lot more people would be put off.
The flaw in that idea is that the key is plastic. Wont conduct the current :(
This is one of my favorite web comics.  &lt;3
me too.
The info is at the bottom corner of the "sign." People usually look for an explanation when they see something odd, so they'll probably see it.
"You know what, fuck it. Next order of business."
Where'd you finish? (shoot your nut)
I certainly feel pretty free, and I can't imagine that his work had nothing to do with it.
KARMA KARMA KARMA KARMA KARMA CHAMELEON!
That bit where they tried convincing your girlfriend you would leave her there just pisses me off.   What good-for-nothing pigs. They just want fucking trouble.
There is 0 evidence for any of them in NIST's report you mean. Why is the 'people carrying in enough of it' part of the explanation.. is 'people needed to carry in enough of it and be detected' science or an opinion of people who had no knowledge of the events of the days prior?   Why is it important to NIST that it has to be true that people would have been detected.  That fact has nothing to do with them, see what i mean?  But it was stated as a reason to throw out theories. I haven't said anything about leprechauns, all of the tangents from the original thread have been assumed and brought up by you. You think the bomb theory is retarded, maybe they did too, but that is a military opinion that took away from their testing, NIST is not military nor do they have the required expertise to be basing science on stuff they don't know.  That makes them more questionable.
&gt;This is a big deal  Is it a big deal because there are over 1 billion Chinese over there and if they came to North America and each of them took one of us captive they would only need half their population to do it?
Can we therefore never say one proposition is more reasonable than another? Like, I might say force = mass*acceleration*gamma I believe this to be true because it's been true in the past. If you said "space is made of licorice" I would have plenty of reasons to doubt it, among them that it has not been true in the past. Isn't that a reasonable basis for belief?
I'm fairly sure that moderators don't have the ability to do that and that its an automated feature when your downvote to upvote ratio drops below a certain point in a specific subreddit.  I could be wrong, but I haven't seen that button anywhere.  Of course moderators can [potentially team up on new submissions, but so can any other user.
Indeed.  I still have the bottle as well.
Yes, but I have only seen them on old Apple computers (at school).  Sim City for the win.
He want's to chat with her on reddit.  DUH!!
Limbaugh is entertaining. And just like anyone else, he does make some good points once in a while, especially when he speaks about smaller government.  Lastly, there's nothing wrong with getting some different viewpoints once in a while. Being contained to the reddit mindset is just as dangerous.
If you're living on campus; buy a fucking foam mattress topper. The dorm mattresses are horribly uncomfortable. 
Yes I have.  Many courses, actually.
You certainly don't sound like you use the script...  And I pointed out that you can do distance jumps without walls:  &gt; If you don't have a wall handy, just shoot your rocket a few feet away from you into the ground. You'll get the hang of the angle with a little experience.  Out of curiosity, what team are you on?
'America' has come to mean USA, and 'American' has come to mean a citizen of the USA.  You can rail uselessly against the majority of the English-speaking world population who have adopted these terms, or you can move on and push less pedantic issues that actually matter.
Plus the other thing is Australians use the metric system. So that means everything in celsius thanks. 
what's the location of this server?
You got it, buddy, that's the one. As bold and blue as you're gonna get on reddit, I think.  ## **WE CAN TRY THE BOLD AND BLUE** but I doubt it works
Fucks sake, I believe.
&gt;Wrong, Anna Schwartz, who was probably the economist closest to Friedman and her collaborator for many decades had denounced Bernake and just last week published an editorial in the NYT saying he should not be re-elected, and that pretty much anyone could do a better job than him.  That is no kind of proof.  Even if the have the same remedies for specific diagnoses, Friedman might have differed with Schwartz's characterization of the present crisis as not a liquidity crisis.  &gt;Note that Friedman himself advocated the abolition of the Fed, and while he might have supported Greenspan in the 90's, he fast pointed out that no Fed Chairman could really do a good job, because it is an inherently impossible job.  First of all, he always said that he was advising what the Fed should do *if* it existed.  But even with that proviso, his advice was disastrous, because he advocated consistent monetary expansion in order to maintain the price level.  *If* the Fed exists, it should not expand the money supply at all.  Secondly, he only wanted to abolish the Fed in order to give the Treasury the power to expand the money supply at will, as can be seen in the following quote (emphasis added):  "Nothing that I have observed in recent decades has led me to change my mind about the desirability of a monetary rule which simply **increased the quantity of money at a fixed rate month after month, year after year**. That rule would get rid of the mistakes and that is probably about all you could expect to get from a monetary system. Even better would be to abolish the Fed and **mandate the Treasury** to keep highpowered money at a constant numerical level."
Seinfeld reference.
Is it the sharp knees?
Great, now im never going to Venezuela. Thank you very much.
ouch, just stubbed my toe
Let me guess... you're a "feminist"
huh? unfortunately there is no cure for some.
I measured it.
ctrl+click in opera
We intelligent people gather on the internet when we're bored.
What kind of deck ya buildin'?
Also 2leep seems to be down, so:  http://www.collegehumor.com/article:1756439
So, reddit, when are you releasing the "I'm on a tree" song?
デゥ山！
My upvote made it 1337 upvotes.
my guess is that at some point, you can point to some big-ass building and be like "yeah, i designed that..."   i also guess that very few architects ever reach that level..   also, it's an artsy sort of job, so for some it might be worth the lower salary if they can exercise their creative muscle frequently and get paid for it. 
I said pretty much said what you did on this [posting](http://www.reddit.com/r/politics/comments/96b4z/birther_offers_100000_reward_for_proof_president/)  and got hit hard.  Just letting you know.
If the American documents say he was a full American citizen and the Indonesian documents say he was an Indonesian citizen...which set should we believe?
*What?* How far along was this relationship? Did she live with you? Did she have stuff in your room? I don't... *what?*
yes.  I know that.
I assure you they're all ironic.
Why blow it up when you can cut of its paws and fuck a hole cut into the side of its still writhing body. 
It's funny that you believe this inane nonsense. Nothing was patented, there is no "explosive-grade" thermite, it wasn't found in steel samples. They claimed that IRON spheres were found in the DUST samples, and while its true, it's not proof of thermite.  How do you like that. I know your own stupid myth better than you do. Try again.
The pure stuff? Or that stuff that's diluted and cut down? :P
That's how they do it! I was wondering what criteria sites used to auto-generate thumbs. I'll have to go back and make some changes...
When I think of crocodiles I think of Steve Irwin. When someone mentions stingrays i think of Steve Irwin too. Actually when I'm in the shower I think of Steve Irwin as well. And I always think of him when I'm driving. Actually I'm always thinking about him. 
that wasn't a penalty, that was a smart guy trying to outsmart a genius
Look at you, hacker. A pathetic creature of meat and bone, panting and sweating as you run through my corridors.  I went into IT Security because of this game. &lt;3
&gt;Perhaps it was listening to a story on talk radio about the scourge known as MDMA, also known as Ecstasy. Nasty stuff. Most of it is also filled with meth, in case you were wondering. Beep beep guy who either doesn't get out much or is very old detected
i was looking forward to this until i heard the country western shit kick in.  i thought you said "musician" in the title?!?
I agree, Obama is selling us out, he told one thing to get elected, then did a 180 soon as he was president.   I started to doubt him when he was talking to a church during fathers day and talking about how hard mothers have it and how fathers are deadbeats.  On fathers day...  It was downhill after that.
Turn off your mind. Don't think so much about it. Honestly.  As for your thesis...do, don't think.   PS, the best things are simple and to the point. So don't overcomplicate anything in your mind (articles, TV shows, writing your thesis). 
Congratulations.
I find it interesting you don't cite the people who actually made the songs.  You chose to cite a producer.  A man that makes nothing.  The equivalent of a patent troll.
"WE got to get up  got to get up  got to get up NOW" Friday night dance mix!
I'd like to lock you in a concrete room for a year and see if you still endorse that catch phrase.
They sleep until 8 or 9 am .. what time do they go to bed though?  
Hey if people cuss it's cool. If they start playing games on the road its dangerous and stupid.  It's not a competition. Some people forget that.
Her and several thousand men in similar circumstances
Malkovich, Malkovich. Malkovich? Malkovich Malkovich Malkovich.
I just left you some Cockney gibberish followed by complete gibberish.
Anyone read Glory Road? I loved it as a kid. It's a little thin but still a good adventure story with plenty of orgies and a fun "the one" plot line.
i'm pretty sure most good programmers just get very annoyed by talentless pr/marketing types trying to ride their proverbial coattails.
FUCKING YES!  That is all.
Does this post exist only because I nearly posted a comment regarding the mile club onto the Ryanair pay toilet article?  I typed it out then didn't submit the comment, went to the new screen to see this post as the first listed.  This happens many times on reddit.  
When talking about sex on the internet always identify yourself as male or female, it changes the dynamic of the story.
If you don't have it how do you spend it?
I don't get the feeling you understand the issue.
i also use "for fuck's sake"
When they can produce we have something to worry about.
If pigheaded idiocy could drag the Republican party down they would have been subterranean for decades.
JESUS EATS BABIES?!
Pink noise is a lot less harsh, while white noise is all static-like, and red noise is like heavy drizzle.  Choose your noise color wisely and the world shall be yours.
If you're running a dual/quad core CPU, make sure you go into the task manager after the game has started and set the affinity to a single core.  That multicore shit freaks SS2 out.
No, the point is that you would lose more energy with this method as you would constantly need to be converting energy from one form to another: electricity to create radio waves, salt water to heat energy, heat energy to kinetic energy. Rather than electricity -&gt; kinetic only.  Plus the added weight of carrying around a tank of salt water and the extra machinery.
It's probably the distance from San Francisco to Tokyo.
you take less damage yourself aswell so i think valve put it there as a way to split accidental self damage from rocketjumps so they could balance each other without it affecting the second one
Nice that you quote, in full text, a bunch of meaningless statistics, then only provide a link to an article that completely refutes them.
Thank god you are here to censor posts that do not fit into your worldview for us.
[Stock Price Rises after Company Disseminates Lethal Virus ](http://dailybrowse.com/index.php?option=com_content&amp;task=view&amp;id=35&amp;Itemid=0)
Ah, thanks! Didn't know we had that subreddit. Subscribed!
Poop
Wait wait wait, I thought the exact opposite was true of redheads.  My sister-in-law and an ex-girlfriend claim to have very high pain tolerance and cite their ginger nature, but now you're telling me they were likely just acting tough? I'm forwarding this to them.
A wonderful little NPR program called Radiolab did a segment on him, including audio interviews with him.  http://www.wnyc.org/shows/radiolab/episodes/2007/06/08/segments/71874
You should set up a speed dial number with your voicemail number that automatically enters your password for you.  I'd tell you how to do it, but I did it once 5 years ago and have never had to do it again.  Also, when you've got enough info from the voicemail just hit 7 or 4.  You don't have to listen to the instructions, they're just there in case you forget how your voicemail works.  Unless you're receiving 20 VMs a day or something, it works pretty well.  Also, as others have mentioned, you can probably hit 1 to get to your actual messages without listening to the intro.
The first two Strokes albums were pretty great.
It gets done faster because if I sweep the floors first, I'll go slower on the counters to make sure nothing spills on to my clean floors.  If I sweep the floor second, I just start wiping everything on the floor first (10 seconds) then wipe with a wet rag.
if you're school or lab doesn't have a membership it's a good bet to check the all the authors' personal sites.  very often the authors maintain a pre-publication version for just such a reason. it may lack some of the bells and whistles, and may have a couple of spelling errors but should be essentially the same as the published version.  edit: why the downvotes?  i find this quite useful, and not infrequently.  this is different and distinct from the official versions of said papers which can 'only be downloaded from ACM etc.'  and it's a lot more useful if you don't have access through a uni or other institution (which if you did, would mean you never had a problem in the first place.)
Please stop campaigning on my behalf until you can slow down and proofread.  
The intro to Nothing Lasts... but Nothing is Lost, by Shpongle is particularly awesome, they whole record is great and the last few tracks are a perfect outro to the album too.
I'd like to see it. Was this just a survey? 
There's an interesting question I've asked myself from time to time: do e.g. chickens actually suffer when you put them in small cages?  They have pretty tiny brains and I'm not really sure if they posess complex emotions and can suffer from depressions. What does reddit think, is it more like:   a) "Oh fuck this cage, I feel so lonely and would love to run free"   or   b) "Cage, can't move \*wait\*"
refer to:http://emedicinehealth.com/pilonidal_cyst/article_em.htm
http://www.stanford.edu/group/cui_group/press/StanfordReport.pdf http://www.stanford.edu/group/cui_group/papers/Spinel%20LiMnO%20Nanorods%20as%20Lithium%20Ion%20Battery%20Cathodes.pdf http://www.stanford.edu/group/cui_group/publications.html
Shit, really? I read the manga, and it ends on a happy note/sort of.
I don't know, but I think this is relevant:  [article about a bar in England that gets you "drunk on air"](http://www.washingtontimes.com/weblogs/out-context/2009/apr/22/new-bar-gets-you-drunk-on-air/)  *edit for formatting.
 //key/following-sibling::*[1]
That's from the evangelical debate (Romney/McCain/Giuliani were afraid to participate and answer these questions). I actually watched it at the time, and they didn't say "yes" they pressed a green button for yes or a red button for no. Which button would you have pressed? If you press the red button then the implication is that you aren't open to examining scientific results that purport to contradict evolution. I'm pretty sure that any scientist (Dawkins etc.) that you put on stage would either push the green button in response to this question or refuse to press any button (but definitely won't push the red button). In any case answering a question is not "speaking out" in favor of something, you should reserve such phrases to people who advocate creationism otherwise your words become meaningless, so just admit that you were wrong.
Maybe I'm too geeky for my own good, but I'd enjoy wearing a shirt with one of these coats of arms on it. The other reddit shirts are already similar enough to 108.
The correct term is Communists. We're all Communists now. 
&gt;Those regulations, I believe, are mostly about testing them, not so much developing them.  Correct. However, that's still millions or even billions of dollars before the drug enters the market.
Okay, even if you didn't know exactly which electronic piece the remote is for, as is the case these days when you have a tv remote, dvd remote, stereo remote, cable box remote, and some leftover remote that you're not really sure what it's for but you've had it for a while and you might need it someday.... okay, I can get being confused about what the new remote is for. But still, the garden? Did you family expect to bump up the brightness on the sunflowers?
Interesting. I figured the rotation would affect it somehow. I guess now I know better!
&gt; So you make claims with zero evidence at all and  &gt; you think you can just shift the burden around and get out of it?  I didn't write a 1000+ page report at government expense whose most obvious effect is to exhonerate the government from involvement in the destruction of the twin towers, said which just issued two fairly major revisions of the story after more than half a decade, under pressure from outsider investigators looking at simple questions any smart high-school physics student would have asked, but NIST didn't.
Tålmod! (Patience)
I've been waiting for this war to happen for a long time. Rush is going to get destroyed. 
Pragmatic?  Again monetarist price-stabilization Fed policy blew up the housing bubble.  And a negative income tax would have created a world of hurt of the moral hazard variety.
I bet I could talk about 100 cadlejaALL GLORY TO TH
Or...   He couldn't find the ground if he fell.
I know this'll probably sound a little sad but the 'It's Just a Ride' bit of Bill Hicks Revelations performance has done me good in the past.
It's a button designed to rest in the pocket. The officer has some poor judgment when deciding to push it. He felt the bag and then decided to hit his button to film the revealing of the drugs on the person. I have little doubt that it looks shady in a decent quality, but probably much less so than this horribly pixilated copy. I have little doubt that the department has now been trained to do things open to the camera. It's also notable that the officer was making sure that the camera Could see him, not that it could not.  (not a cop fan)
Denmark, 75$ phone, ~3 cents to send an sms, free to receive (people paying to receive a message or call is completely unheard of here), 13 cents a minute for outgoing calls a minute with a 10 cents starting fee on calls. No monthly fee and no usage minimum.
Source?
White weenie control-agro.  Silence!
Pretty much what im getting at, im mocking the use of the word "related".
You know what the best part of American health care is? More dead Americans. AM I RIGHT GUYS?!
Yeah, anyone who has a different worldview is obviously a troll.  
Lol. now that's what I'm talkin about.  But I'm afraid I am far ahead of Pascale and Khouri where drinks are concerned.  It does make me feel a certain extra connectedness to them knowing that I am drinking to their deaths with them.
What "read your mind" websites?
**JIHAD!!!**
Score one for the duck. Next round, baby vs. walrus.
All hail ginger barbie dissector! 
nah, thats whack, more like [this](http://www.autorush.com/display_photo.php?photo=IMG_0537.jpg&amp;eventid=314)
Whats most important about this is that there is nothing to prove the guy even said this linked to the story. A spokesman emailed this blogger. This guy could have gone on any news network and they would have been fighting over the guy to get 2 minutes of time for him to say whatever tardism he is working with this day. 
&gt;I doubted his intents as soon as I saw the multiple accounts, of which there really is no need for aside from (imo) dishonest downvoting &amp; upvoting.  Two words: novelty accounts.
Yes.
Part of my definition of love is accepting someone, warts and all.  It's the humanity that has people be so endearing.  Without it, there's nothing to triumph over.  How droll would that be?
Ooooh.  Consider me severely chastened.
Bull Marker or BS ? Peter Schiff July 30 2009 CNBC Fast Money
There are some very impressive microbreweries throughout America.  I've enjoyed them all.  Before I discovered wine, I was a serious beer connoisseur.  I know more about beer than anyone I know personally.  And while many Americans are great, there is no place on earth that can make beer better than Germany.  I don't know why. The Hefe-Weisse - I've had the American attempts to copy, from reputable and otherwise excellent breweries.   It disgusts me, frankly, that they can't even get close to the Authentic German Hefe-Weisse.  Schneider und Sohne Brewerei makes the best in the world. That said, there are a great variety of beers that I'd say America does better or at least as good as the rest of the world.  There are some breathtaking stouts in America.  Impressive Ales that almost rival the Belgians. I finished off a Ravenswood Zinfandel last night and it was very nice.   I haven't had Ridge, Green and Red, or Three R's and I greatly appreciate the suggestion.  I'll check it out. I do like the Australian shiraz.  They don't blow me out of the water, but they're nonetheless a very reasonable price for a pretty enjoyable wine. Il Bastardo (man, I still haven't opened it.  probably tomorrow) is straight Sangiovese I believe.  I haven't had it before; I'll let you know.
fuck. no. i finally decided to register just so i could say this: fuck. no. you. fucking. imbecile.  complex != better. if you need multi-cores just to render your fucking page then you're doing it wrong.  period.
Cop tease
Stephen Colbert killed pedobear?
gunpoint? 
That's me. D: I hate it.
MY EYES!!!
amazing results of chess players, especially strong ones, are not closer to theoretical result, even if that is based on a judegement of crowds and most pick in the 20-22 range.  Also surprising that 2nd round didn't clue players in more.
Why isn't every religion a cult? Time, only time. I suppose Mormons have been around long enough to be considered a religion. Weird and wacky still but eventually even that will fade and they will be thought of as "normal". 
Shouldn't the entropy one specify that it's for the entire universe? You can locally decrease entropy quite easily.
"Surely You're Joking, Mr. Feynman!" by Richard Feynman  After the Feynman-fever that swept through /r/science a while back, I'm surprised that this hasn't been mentioned yet.
Well, "Monkey King" made me think of that guy in Forbidden Kingdom, but I dare say this was much more awesome.
Nutmegs awesome =0. If it wasn't for the whole "contains safrole, which has been linked to liver cancer" thing I'd do it more often. 
Why is it worth more than your car?
[Wear Sunscreen](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sTJ7AzBIJoI)  (family history of melanoma)
He did show his "birth certificate."  More than likely, YOURS says "Certificate of Live Birth" on it just the same as the President's. Yes, he's the President, and he didn't even steal the election to get it.
I recently found this subreddit and this post reminds me why I subscribed.
clever headline, not too sure it was appropriate...
Is that an earlier book?  This is the first of his that I've read, I think through the recommendations of Io9.
I'm dealing with this same conundrum. :)
I can't help but hate myself for this one. [S Club 7 - S Club Party](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-X0EjwF8o0g)
I'm willing to bet a lot less since most people that use IE just use whatever came with their computer.
Por eso tienen a la líder que tienen si es rete harto representativa del gremio
Guilty until proven innocent.  Welcome to the new America
I saw this thread and this song was the first one to pop in my head. I went to play it, and the moment it began to play I saw your comment.   I'm scared.
camera
no we jerk once we're in the circle
Why do you need it to be thermite?  And i still have not heard any researcher bring up leprachauns, many people have brought up bombs, why not look into it?
After the countdown is over, I had a heart attack from those screams, blew my eardrums right out.
Thats obviously because cows (what you call "sea cows") are only native to the Atlantic ocean
i don't really understand the landscape shot complaints  in fact i am downright confused.  how does any scene  resemble the  photos taken, really? thats what keeps us poring over these images.  and how doesn't those photo's resemble reality? thats how sometimes the impact of images taken outstrip many great landscape paintings of the same scenes.
Don't be stupid, they're... fireflies, that just got stuck up there in that big blueish-black thing.
And this is how natural selection works.
Right on.
There should be never be a coloration between a fine and a state profit.  Thats the downfall of society when they rob peter to pay paul. 
My life in Boulder is nowhere near this hilarious. I think I need to hang out at The Bus Stop more. ;]
You're the one imploring us to "trust me" in both the headline, and the follow-up post.  Make up your mind.
Negative. It is a common part of the local vernacular though. 
Motley Who?
Romance of the Three Kingdoms by Luo Guanzhong. Incredibly epic, slightly fictionalized history.
Care to elaborate?
&gt; There is 0 evidence for any of them in NIST's report you mean.  No, period. There is zero evidence for them, period.  &gt; Why is the 'people carrying in enough of it' part of the explanation.. is 'people needed to carry in enough of it and be detected' science or an opinion of people who had no knowledge of the events of the days prior?  If you knew what thermite was, you'd know why. If you knew how a "thermite induced collapsed" would have to work, you'd know why. Since you don't know anything about thermite, I understand why you are asking these silly questions. I suggest you do some research.  &gt; Why is it important to NIST that it has to be true that people would have been detected. That fact has nothing to do with them, see what i mean? But it was stated as a reason to throw out theories.  Again, you are lying about what NIST said and did. The official answer to the question you keep quoting is given, and then they say "furthermore" to help give ADDITIONAL reasons why it's ridiculous. You keep focusing on their ADDITIONAL reasons and pretending its their SOLE reason.  Again, the PRIMARY reason NIST threw out thermite is because its RIDICULOUS, IMPLAUSIBLE, and UNNECESSARY as a hypothesis. Just like fucking leprechauns.
Here's the [comics folder](http://www.kukuburi.com/v2/comics/); use DTA on the relevant portions to save loading time and bandwidth for the author.
I hate that kitchen/outfit coordinating megamechastreisand-size bitch. May her and her Kwanzaa cake making perfectly matching ass rot in food hell.
&gt;  It'd be like that episode of Simpsons; 'Flaming Moes'.  You win at the internet.  You can't really beat that episode.  It's my belief that something is going to come along and will be the real thing.  (I'm losing hope it will be a federal lab) I haven't really had any intellectual property or patent law.  I've had a little international trade law.  And as obvious as it seams, we can't really enforce patents internationally other than protecting industries domestically.  But I think we all agree that our ability to do such will diminish with the increasingly emergence of a global economy.  Will the GATT/WTO really be able to do this?  I hope so, but I don't know.  The fact that we're in a country that, in a whim, will go bat shit crazy and start a war goes in our favor.  No one likes to mess with the crazy guy.  Especially when he's so big and strong.  I have to head out, but I'd like to ponder the super patent idea.  Thoughts?
Censorship is bad, though.
Fap like you've never fapped before.
&gt; What were you stressed out about at fifteen years old???  &gt; So, why not go for the gold now right now, you're thinkin?!? (die of cancer)  What a cocky asshole. I would never let someone that condescending interview me.
&gt; But even with that proviso, his advice was disastrous  Get a grip, his advice was directly responsible for **the end** of *stagflation*. If it was not for his 'disastrous' advice the whole world would look much more like Zimbabwe.
Well I really love my bike.  And it's probably worth about the same as my bike.  Edit: Clarify
Cincinnati/Northern KY is really not that bad.  I live here and there are some great people and there are some shitty people, just like everywhere else.
Thanks Wtmh, I know all about the DC/HT cpus and the like. That's one of the first things I make sure that I fix up :)
Heh.  Karma whoring is the best seven bucks you ever spent! :P
He plead guilty and got the maximum fine. What have we learned?  Never plead guilty.  Make them prove your case and cry a lot about your shitty life.  You will most likely get much less.
I also bought 6 collectible bottles of West 12 on eBay. They were a great addition to my collection. Expensive glass though, set me back about $120!  Loved the beer, it's better (but not leaps and bounds better) than say a St. Bernardus Abt 12 (their quad and also a top rated beer in the world). So I'll stick to the St. Bernardus for easy availability and price. I HAD to have the West though. 
Do-do-do do do-do-do-do do.
They definitely are hands off kind of place. They are even taught/coached how to discreetly keep back the grabby guys/girls. If it gets too bad they walk off, and may even get the bouncer.
Aha, you see what I did there. :^)
Oh, he knows about boobs, all right.  Knows about them, heard about them, joked about them, fantasized about them.  Just never seen them.
The federal highway system is slavery too. I don't even own a car.
[I knew it!](http://fabricmag.com/wp-content/uploads/2009/07/jake-gyllenhaal.jpg)
I am using carpet in a different context.
Where is that from?
Whoa no, I just posted this because I am going on a trip tomorrow and I wanted to know, plus its a pretty funny question to ask.
Old picture is old. Downvoted.
second sentence - "make sure to count updates, since this is counting all the .* versions of FF too"
On the positive side this low life span gave them smaller carbon footprints. ;)
I think I missed this one.
The possibility that the American people will not end up with universal health care or with a strong government health care option is the result of 3 things.
Maybe you just haven't found music you like. If you don't know the first thing about music, you are probably only exposed to the utter crap thats on terrestrial radio and tv and such. Maybe go to pandora or last.fm and go through lots of specific genres until you find something?
I have to disagree because I don't respect your right to a personal opinion.  The Farseer Series by R Hobb is one of my favorites and that's all that matters.
I'll just wait over here for the arrival of LoD. I've heard he is making the rounds today.  
What?!
I'm fairly certain it's haemolymph pumped into the veins of the wings until turgid and dry.
The key is how you define communication. I believe mikeymell was talking about *successful* communication, where people make an honest effort to understand each others' thoughts and positions. Conference calls, correspondence, meetings, memos, whatever aren't exactly communication. For the most part, they're just bullshit.
so very very nice of you to share with us. Thank you 
Ya, Arcade Fire doesn't do much for me. Dunno what it is but their jams just seem kinda boring. Ahh well. To each his own I suppose. (Haven't seen NCIS though, but I'll assume it was meant as a dis.)
Mushrooms! Like truffle oil, anything.
Yes. I, Stephen Colbert, have annihilated that beast.
I'm not sure it would ever be a good idea to stick your finger in an unknown asshole.
Not yet, my friend. Not. Yet.
Not a good troll, you needed to add more of the tin foil hat propaganda going around. 0/10.
I learned that logic as a kid..  IF some A are B, then all B are A.... false.
That the criminal laws of a country are not some supernatural truth to be held up as a divine force, but are simply social engineering tools of (usually) well meaning politicians trying to make (and sometimes failing) our societies work better.
insane in the membrane 
Yeah I know this feeling, but somehow my girl has a period every week. I keep telling her to see the doctor, but she says it's normal.   :(
Artistically speaking, this is the far superior composed design..... if i say so myself...
Done. Next?
Avoid projectlocker if you've got anything sensitive - they seem to be storing the password in plaintext... (I.e not really security conscious)
So when are you gonna let me tap that?
She was my g/f for a year, and lived with me. But its my house that I own, I might would understand if something was in the room that shouldn't be, but I had personally cleaned the room before my family came over.
evidence? logic? have you ever tried arguing this?
I did it for the LULZ.
**MAN!**
"it" in my comment is in response to Limbaugh, not Stewart.  
BINGO! The 3 biggest outspoken republicans I know are all on some sort of government assistance. They all hate college (2 failed out multiple times), and they all complain about socialism while they suck on the tit of my taxes. What a fucking joke!
But you see, old people are basically rejected under priority lists anyway.   Not all grandmas are poor. There is a thing called a pension. In fact, my grandma has paid for a hip replacement: the exact example that you give.  Again, I'd be for national healthcare if it wasn't so damn tyrannically imposed. See [this link](http://www.infowars.com/whats-really-in-obamas-health-care-reform-bill-a-plain-english-translation/) for some key details of the health bill.
I FUCKIN' *KNEW* IT!!
http://lmgtfy.com/?q=MYLAN+A4
she has the key to being frugal when it comes to large expensive items down: document and keep. Essential to keep allthese things in an easy tofind manner. The manufacturers profit margins depend on you not calling those warranties in. 
What would you recommend instead? (for beat generation or something by Kerouc) 
I love that song.  Most famous drum break in all of music.
FOR NARNIA!!!
Thank Fuck!  is all I have to say..
Castle in the Sky = easily my favorite Miyazaki movie. I think Nausicaä is kind of overrated.
heheh, very nice.
Oh I'm not falling for that again.  Every time I try to cut a deal on some brains for these these ignorant straw men, my side of the bargain always seems to involve me trekking all over the country side, doing RPG style quests for towns of little people, which *obviously* upsets the magical types who love nothing more than to send their personal armies to put an end to that.  Then on top of that, you have to fight trees.  Why?  Because they attack you.  Why?  I have no fucking idea and I'm tired of trying to figure it out.  I'll pass on those brains.  I'm perfectly happy just pointing out the straw men when I find them.  Let somebody else go through the trouble.  *P.S. Now that I think about it, The Wizard of Oz sounds a lot like a children's book adaptation of Lord of the Rings.*
I bought a Rossi .38 back in the 90's for $179 and it was a piece of crap.  I can't imagine the gun you're referring to is going to be any better.  As has been said elsewhere in this thread, a used S&amp;W or Ruger .38 or .357 would be the way to go, if you need affordable quality.
Can we get a thread with hundreds of anecdotal accounts of healthcare about Canada again?  Because that would be awesome.  Also, will you guys give me a handjob when you're done?  That would be awesome, too.
Nothing to say so you attack the opponent.  So sad. I think the populace will just get smarter and smarter as bells go off anytime some angry blowhard starts tearing down his opponent without having any governing policies or skills to stand on him or herself.  That will be the clue to vote elsewhere.
Take the lead.  Even if he's well versed in porn or Wikipedia it doesn't mean he has much of a clue what's going on for real.  Start out on top so he doesn't have to do much of anything but take in your nakedness and the awesomeness of the situation.  Missionary can be weird for newbs.  Make sure he's comfortable being with you.  Make sure he knows that you know he's a virgin to lessen the pressure on him.  I'd say don't even bother explicitly telling him what he's doing good or bad; just guide him in his actions.  Don't be drunk.  Either of you.  And use a condom.  I lost my v-card drunk and without a condom.  The girl was bangin' though so I didn't care much.  And fuck him twice that night.  Especially if something goes wrong the first time.
I agree. His characters are usually less perfect then usual protagonists, I enjoy what he writes
Welcome to the internet, where people skew irrelevant points and where daftness abounds.  You have the choice to live whatever kind of life you want, and I bet you wouldn't be that happy in cage.  Unless that's what you're into.  
Depends what you mean by academic and IQ test.  Ideally, they're pretty similar, right?
Damn with all the reasons I don't want to move to Cali, this makes me really want to move to Cali!
It seems to me that , considering the random position of randrops as you touch them, you can probably think of a rainstorm as a bunch of droplets stuck in mid air through which you run, thereby accumulating more water. If this assumption is roughly correct (and I don't see why it wouldn't be), the faster you go, the more water you smack into. I think as long as you're going sufficiently fast relative to the water, this should be true. If, however, the rain is blowing at you at a very high speed, the difference between running and walking is probably negligible, since the interaction between you and water has more to do with the water's speed than yours. 
&gt;I have to believe in a world outside my own mind. I have to believe that my actions still have meaning, even if I can't remember them. I have to believe that when my eyes are closed, the world's still there. Do I believe the world's still there? Is it still out there?... Yeah. We all need mirrors to remind ourselves who we are. I'm no different. -[Leonard Shelby](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0209144/)
I really agree that this is a major problem. The number of intelligent, reasonable people I know that have this almost superstitious hatred of even basic mathematical concepts is disgusting. I certainly know that the problems I had with maths stem from never being taught the basics beyond simple memorisation without understanding.
I find your lack of faith in our system disturbing.
I heard he doesn't tip well too.
*with metal gear solid to tekken three*
¿Cuál imagen? No es de extrañarse. En efecto somos el 2do. consumidor de refrescos del mundo y el mercado más importante para Coca~Cola.
That's his name in Chinese. The author is of Chinese descent.
I dated a woman like that once.
Yet he always disapproves.
Technically you can also pee standing up without using a tool, but that requires lots of practice properly gripping and who wants to spend all day practicing how to pee...?
Make it.
Something about his voice really annoys me, yet I keep listening to that song.
I think someone said the whole thing was a promotional ploy...
A flat negative income tax would be a billion times better than the current insane mess the US has.  As for moral hazard, it would be nothing compared with the current galactic levels of moral hazard in the system.  You seem to suffer from a total lack of sense of *proportion*, which Friedman was very much aware of: something that is not perfect is much better than something that is insanely bad. And unlike many of his fundamentalist critics, he did manage to change many things *for the better*, while all their bitching and moamming about how things *should be* has accomplished very little, and that is probably why they resent him.
Why DRM is GOOD:  If it wasn't wouldn't people stop buying it?  No this is a serious question. Apple controls the supply and demand. They have positioned themselves such that people want to buy because of the apps and developers want to develop because of the people. Now if you take away control over this, users will willynilly download apps from random places. Developers will try to enforce some sort of a DRM which will be inconsistent. Users will not trust applications because of poor DRM. And the whole cycle falls apart.  Whatever apple has done certainly deserves some share of the market. As long as they provide what people want they will be successful. If you got a better idea, go for it.  PS: before you do you should see if someone else hasn't tried your idea. Look at other "app stores" and see how successful they have been.
I always pick up change, including pennies.
How did I end up here? Why do my eyes feel bloodshot? My mouth is SO dry. I'm hungry. The music sounds better than usual. Colors seem more vivid. Smells are more raw and complex. My headache is gone. I'm a bit clumsy. My whole body feels relaxed and pleasant. I feel creative and philosophical. What were we talking about again? My perception of time seems altered, some moments pass quickly and other moments of time pass very slowly. Sputum from my lungs accumulates faster in my throat. My upper chest and throat feel a bit irritated. 
Only 5,133.
I've noticed other people noticing the negative space.
Shrug, if you want me to take your criticism seriously, you are going to need to back it up with something more than appealing to intuition. You can't.   NIST backed up their work rigorously, and extensively. I'm not asking you to do the same.. I'm  just asking for the equation you used to make the statement you made. Obviously you don't have one, so obviously you have no basis for that statement.   Just a dude talking out of your ass. NIST has 1000 pages of evidence, math, and science backing them up. You have zero.
It's Cox' because 'x' ends with a 'es' sound.  Someone failed 5th grade.
Hey, you were lucky to get treated the same day! When I was 12, I had a compound fracture in my forearm (both the ulna and radius were protruding) on a Friday, silly me, so I had to wait until Monday to get treated. The doctor was busy playing golf, and our insurance at the time left no alternative. I'm currently debating getting needed healthcare for another severe issue, because of the cost. It's pretty sad that I consider myself middle class, but have to ration my own health care because I simply can't afford all the treatment I really need.
Is this real? Do people like this actually exist? More importantly, do others take obvious blatant lies as the truth? I love the teh interwebs but when I see it used like this I hate it, really hate it.
You know how I know you're gay?
Easy experiment - Roll a ball off a table. Attempt to drop another ball from table height right when the rolling ball leaves the table.
Yah dont take his pulse or check his breathing, just snap a crappy picture and post it on the internet. 
ya, ya i did.
I've read this novel a few times, the last about five years ago. Because it came out in 1960, I think it needs to be read in light of the Cold War and the Space Race.  Notice Luna habitation started as penal colonies, and it has a Russian area and a Chinese area. Also notice the Luna protagonists (to my recollection) have Western European--including Spanish--names. This implies the Communists (USSR &amp; China) won a War and sent dissidents from North &amp; South America and/or Western Europe to the Moon as prison slave labor.  Now for the old Space Race to the Moon. It wasn't (originally) just a pissing contest demonstrating which government/philosophy is superior at whipping out bigger rockets and aiming them with greater precision. Watch Heinlein's 1950 movie *Destination: Moon*, and you'll catch some propaganda of why establishing dominance on the Moon is so gosh darn important. The Luna people in *Harsh Mistress* use this to their advantage, and I won't explain it here for fear of "spoiling" *Mistress* for you.
If just seeing the label is harmful, imagine what'll happen if you actually drink the stuff!
OK i am at the airport but they want to know which flight i want to go on... damndamndamn
&gt; but not vis-a-vis gold whose future looks brighter by the day. I'm no fan of fiat money, but "brighter by the day" only because fiat money is devaluing itself or "brighter by the day" because [the gullible are tricked into moving their life savings into it](http://www.onyxbits.de/content/blog/patrick/buying-gold-crisis-proof-investments-not-good-idea)?
&gt;I mean did they do an autopsy and find psilocin in his blood stream?  Why wouldn't they? 
I still have my Atari Portfolio, and it works. Used it extensively in high school in the mid-90's; all my teachers thought it was a graphing calculator (of course, it did no such a thing; at least I didn't have any apps for that would).
as I said elsewhere, it's not tooting your own horn, it's inspirational to get others to do something too... and now I'm making brownies for my little girl and my girlfriend. what sacrifice!
They forgot the most important step.  Find a woman.  Ez people I'm just being sarcastic.  You don't really need a woman... any girl will do.  (que rimshot)
My friend mated with his girlfriend in a similar fashion, except his gonads were the first thing to go.
I have used my imagination - and I suspect you are being modest :)   I'd be willing to bet that you are beautiful.   Regardless - keep on posting miss!  They are much appreciated.
you know what amazes me .. its how many people lift stuff INCORRECTLY. I used to lift shit totally the wrong way till i started working out and i see it every day in work and its not funny. 
Hahaha I should feel bad for chuckling... but dammit I did.
'...pack of massive genitalia alter*ing* scorpions...'
Hacker-Pschorr Weisse and Blue Moon
I bet you say that to all of the unsuspecting assholes. 
Feels like The Shield could have been based on just those cops.
Word, well, seriously, if you are ever down for hanging out, we both seem to be into reddit and the same age, maybe, it'd, uh, work.   Plus, I need a wingman for c-town pussy patrol. Yeah i just wrote that sentence. 
Lojack on my bicycle? is that even possible?
Steamboy is not essential by any stretch of the term.
&gt; Which is why I know Democrats who still haven't shut up about Gore losing in 2000.  I'm not a Democrat, but I think Gore was robbed. The Republicans fixed that election in many ways, as BBC journalist Greg Palast and others have documented. Plus the fact that Gore clearly won the popular vote seals it. The fact that we haven't changed to a flat-out, fair popular vote after that fiasco is testimony to how broken the US electoral system is.  &gt; Presidential elections are fixed at the primaries.  To an extent. But to me the primary problem is with the duopoly -- the bogus "two party system" which is rigged only for the benefit of the two ruling parties.  "Our democracy is but a name. We vote? What does that mean? It means that we choose between two bodies of real, though not avowed, autocrats. We choose between Tweedledum and Tweedledee." -- Famous American socialist (and blind person) Helen Keller, 1911.
... With Theorybends tongue.
Even if you allow frictionless bearings, impossibly strong alloys, etc., you can still stop the plane. 
yeah yeah, but no one needs to work 40 hours a week doing bs, obviously
I don't want to know what she's planning to do with the sextant.
Trigonometry is beautiful. There are so many things that seem difficult and boring that nobody ever takes the time to tell you are actually fantastically awesome. Take the periodic table, for instance, I wish someone had bothered to tell me that it contained the entire universe. There, on a page in the back of your textbook, the contents of the **entire fucking universe**. Powerful stuff.
It seems everyone says that, but lots have changed in the past 19 years.   Clinton beats Bush in a three way race but eventually is impeached, son of Bush becomes a two termer, 9/11 happens, wars in Iraq and Afghanistan happen, Katrina happens, and the US gets its first black President. Cellphones became something everyone has, the Internet became something just about everyone uses for both personal and business, Asian cars got better while American car companies went out of business, red China is going to be the world's next superpower because of America's love affair with their cheap labor, and speaking of colors red now means conservative and blue now means liberal. Remember how older people and some kids were saying that music was so much better in the 60s and 70s back in 1990? Well there are actually people who say the same thing about the 80s and 90s music.   I'm stopping now because I'm starting to ramble, but if you went into a coma in 1990 and woke up today you might not realize it but there would be a lot to adjust to. 
I guess you could say it was a *line* drive!
First : Congratulations :)  Second: answered !   Third: How old is she.   Footnote: Only know that the first time SUX... ALOT... BIG TIME....  If someone says that they had a great first time they are lying... 
It's the equivalent of saying "Do you want the door you chose, or both of these two doors?"
FUCKING INVASIVE POPUPS!!!!!!!!!!!!!! fuck that artical
You had a large pussy on your tailbone?!?!?!
Did you just spoil the upcoming movie for me?
checkmate!
Yeah I can definitely understand that it's ridiculously expensive if you're doing them piecemeal.  But I'm on a family plan with 5 lines, so we amortize the unlimited texting fee ($30/month for all lines) across each of us.
Renderings do not need to be creative- the design they are representing needs to be creative. Renderings such as these are most useful when showing what the architect has planned to a client who is not experienced in the sort of spacial planning that people in the industry are.
The experiment was a farce, and the kids acted how Dr. Zimtardo wanted them to act.   Before each day, he'd have a round table meeting with the guards, telling them to step up their roles.   Even then, the "atrocities" committed by the student guards are grossly exaggerated.  Two students were forced to hug each other (forced being used very loosely).  Violence, or even threat thereof, never worked itself into it. One student, who felt he'd had enough verbal assault, went on a hunger strike until the guards would be cool again, rather than opting out of the experiment or, god forbid, threaten someone with violence.  The "experiment" ended when Zimbardo felt he had enough footage to make a deceiving video. Is that what you'd do if your classmates and a sadistic professor were abusing you to the end of an experiment?  No.  Nobody was abused.  It's a big circus that plagues the psych community, and it needs to be killed with fire.  /*soapbox*
This is an old topic, but I'm not familiar with this argument. Can you educate a newbie?
Well $675k is less than the over a million they spent prosecuting it. They obviously cannot sue everyone.   I announce a battle of attrition! We keep making them sue us until they run out of money. 
True, there are a lot of non-Americans here.  There are lots of people here who are critical of America because it has a huge, *huge* influence around the world. Our country is a mainstay in their daily local news cycle. Everyone watches us. More criticism, and probably more hate than it deserves? Yeah, I think so, but people's general opinion, I think, is good.
Hmm.  Maybe I have knee problems.  I can kneel, but can't really sit back on my heels.
My brother used to do that. 
The guy who made that sign sure forgot his learning.
There is no way that someone doesn't know the word "job" but can spell "mcdonalds," improper capitalization and punctuation aside. 
A little annoying, but every API I have used would have no problem searching for a particular key or returning the next node following it.
Zed has toned things down a *lot* since he's switched to Python. If you've read his blog you'll find he's usually reasonable and doesn't insult people he's having disputes with.  Makes you wonder if Ruby is cursed.
Actually since I have only liability insurance, this scheme would not work.
Sorry, I wasn't trying to dodge your question.  I don't know enough about castration of any sort to say that someone is rendered safe afterward. But I was trying to say that if castration is what's necessary, that I might advocate it for high risk repeat offenders. If that is not a cure-all (I don't know) I might even be willing to advocate euthanasia.   Again, I'm not a doctor, psychologist, etc. I was just around these guys for 40-50 hours a week and knew them to be highly dangerous, and, from what I understood at least, not able to be rehabilitated.  EDIT: I also want to point out that I'm not in law enforcement or in the prison industry. I was just some guy who looked after adults with developmental disabilities (some of whom were awesome people) and this was just one house I worked in at one time.
I don't get how somebody could just have a memory dump like that. I could understand having a failing short term memory, like an old and senile man. You remember everything up to 30 seconds ago, but not anything beyond that. "Rebooting" just seems incredibly strange.
And you broke up right there? Were there problems beforehand, or was that moment just too crazy? Feel free not to answer this. I know it's anonymous on the Internet and all, but I still feel like I'm prying. Still though... that is a weird story.
For future reference you can open the International Preference pane and select the Input menu tab, enable "Keyboard Viewer" and check "Show input menu in menu bar.  The Keyboard Viewer application will show you the values for all default keys and their modified values.  http://imgur.com/qAAqI.png
Would you like to preorder my game? :)
this is hilarious!  no.. wait... it was hilarious when i first saw it in 2002
"Don't be evil"?
If you honestly believe that our government is built or geared to ensure that the majority always gets its way over the minority, especially in terms of allowing the majority to take from the minority, then there's little I or any one else can do to help you outside of providing a complete re-education in civics.
Any recommendations towards blues rock blogs would be appreciated.
To his defense, she is a disgusting blob that is flashing her flabby gross boobs.  
Fuck you.   I'm going into the Border Patrol, and then a (hopeful) career as a cop.  Reddit comments notwithstanding, I am a humble person who is going to become a cop to make a town a safer place.  You are generalizing a HUGE group of people by looking at the extremes that get into the media.  Do you think the media is going to report on the huge majority of cops who do their job properly and want to make the nation a safer place?  No, of course not.  The media reports sensational stories of police brutality that misrepresent the police force as a whole.  I have met with many cops through my school criminal law degree program and through rotary and through everyday interaction both in town and in the fire department and I have yet to meet a dirty fucker corrupt cop.  I can't speak for everywhere, but cops in my town are all decent people trying to do their jobs and I have no reason to think its different anywhere else.   Except NYC.  That place is a clusterfuck cop-wise.   EDIT: to those who say cops get away with all sorts of shit, google "Greece NY police" and you get story after story of the Greece police force getting caught and hammered for the shit they pulled.  A Greece cop just got convicted with a MAXIMUM allowed sentence for... I forget what, but it was pretty bad.
for 6+ years - wasn't too bad, but you do feel detached from everyone else  i always wanted to mow my lawn at 2am to let my neighbors know how it felt though
I don't think it's unfair to lay at least *some* of the blame at Friedman's feet for the withholding tax.  In his own words:  &gt;And so people at the Treasury tax research department, where I was working, investigated various methods of withholding. I was one of the small technical group that worked on developing it.  [Source](http://www.reason.com/news/show/29691.html).  As for inflation, you're absolutely right that he advocated abolishing the Fed but he nonetheless believed in a total state monopoly over the supply of money and believed in government inflation--controlled government inflation--but still, inflation. I don't think that you can call this a libertarian stance.  Otherwise, you're right about abolishing the draft.  Major oversight on my part and that does absolutely tip the scales in his favor.  However, I'm still not convinced about the utilitarian approach to libertarianism; it seems like he did a lot of harm to achieve that amount of good. If the government didn't control the money supply, could it wage war as often as it does? I don't think that it's even debatable that the answer is no.
I think this one effectively captures Reddit the best.  The envelope really ties the shirt together.
I love how the lead singer also sings the backing vocals.
Something around 10-20$ would be good. I am just really paranoid because someone broke into my locker once and when try to do research for locks, there were only guides to cracking them.   I decided to buy this: http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/B00004SQLH/ref=ox_ya_oh_product
The US caused economic collapse affected China too.  They are propping up US$, letting its currency fall in tandem to stimulate growth.  Its plateaued because China inflation fears have gone away.
can cut you from their bloated budgets
After reading the article, I don't know what's more horrifying.  Having house centipedes,   or   The fact that you have them means that they're feasting on a large volume of other insects that live in your house, such as spiders, bedbugs, termites, cockroaches, silverfish, ants. 
I hate bee bombs.
ok, then why is people carrying enough 'something' in to blow the building apart not part of the investigation?  Because that idea is equated with leprachauns.  By you and NIST maybe, but if it is true or false, people who have questioned it are given more strength because it was dismissed.  They should have looked at it and added fuel to the fire.  It lends to the idea that they were ordered to be under a certain scope by Bush. If someone says it is ridiculous they have to back it up, but not with a basic opinion outside of their expertise on such a serious matter.
oh wow! you met the president! 
The first time I heard Phil, he was telling some woman she wouldn't be able to tell an aborted fetus from a shrimp cocktail if he served it to her on a plate. Classic.
Relations are generally a higher-level view of the problem than objects, so it is often the case that writing part of your program in relations instead of objects makes it simpler. Unfortunately, the two main languages for expressing computations in terms of relations are Prolog and SQL. Prolog's semantics constrain it to be inefficient when you express relational queries in a natural way, and SQL is ugly, verbose, and inflexible.
i googled around a bit for you and found a couple of documents at microsoft describing the various [user groups](http://www.microsoft.com/resources/documentation/windows/xp/all/proddocs/en-us/lsm_overview_01.mspx?mfr=true) and the different [account types](http://www.microsoft.com/resources/documentation/windows/xp/all/proddocs/en-us/usercpl_overview.mspx?mfr=true). you'll likely want to set them up as `Users`, limiting their system access. if you're going to stick with Windows XP, that is.
My town was pretty much all fucking cows 20 years ago. The crooks who pretend to be Native Americans didn't open up their "Indian casino" until 1992. 
it's sad i know
no.
feel free, but you'd be wrong.
I'm pretty sure the laws of thermodynamics still apply off-world.
&gt; But then again I am just a white trash Southern boy who feels helping people in need is the right thing to do. Yeap, I am not as sophisticated as they NYC people.  Good for you.
That's the funniest forum thread I've ever seen. Holy shit, I just stopped laughing.
Agreed...  And here's my ???????????????
No, this is a song about Jayne.
I've noticed this post before.  I've also noticed that it's an unintentional optical illusion that doesn't mean anything....
&gt; When he finds a female, he bites into her skin, and releases an enzyme that digests the skin of his mouth and her body, fusing the pair down to the blood-vessel level. The male then atrophies into nothing more than a pair of gonads, which releases sperm in response to hormones in the female's bloodstream indicating egg release.  Yeah, that sounds pretty familiar :)
+1 for the spot on description.
I'm 24 and Hispanic from NYC. My feelings to the police are significantly less hostile than most of my friends who are white. For the most part I'd rather deal with police than the gangsters who live in my neighborhood. I have had bad experiences with the police, one time when it was completely my fault (I was cursing at someone very loudly in children's playground; the cop gave me a ticket for trespassing and it was dismissed.) Then another time when I was walking around queens and then cops threw me and against a wall and searched me for a concealed weapon (in this situation the cop was being a dick cause he threatened me when I was looking at his badge.)  Besides this I have found police to be generally pretty decent to deal with; some nice police officers even let me and my friends keep out beer when were drinking underage in the park after it was closed.   My white friends who are more unlawful than me have more experiences with the police and more of those experiences are negative. 
and you are from what planet?
GJ ! :D   Consequence : Women become even more interesting &amp; masturbating   doesn't
I'm an Australian who lived in the US for 10 years, raising a small family.   The Australian system is slightly different to candadian, but similar enough.  The american health care system is crazy.  The only reason why americans are scared of change is because they have not experienced the better healthcare in most other developed places in the world.  I've since moved my family back to Australia.   I miss some things about the US, but healthcare is not one of them.  But this brings up something I hadn't considered regarding this political problem.  Are insurance companies strong-arming doctors into spreading bullshit?   Are they threatening direct repercussions to doctors that support a single-payer system?
I'm drunk and I give up.  Unless it has something to do with the reverse airflow also created by the treadmill.  And that would be some really serious speed.
I tried watching a torrented copy, but I failed. I got plastered, thinking it would make more sense. It didn't work. I don't know how anybody can watch that without tearing their eyes out.
&gt;As such, the major automakers like GM, Ford (F) and Honda (HMC) all started working on hydrogen cars. Slashing the funding hurts those companies.  They seem to be adhering to the [sunk cost fallacy](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Sunk_costs#Loss_aversion_and_the_sunk_cost_fallacy).  Also, Congress bears much of the responsibility for placing automakers in this position, since they severely distorted the market by providing incentives to develop less promising energy technologies, despite what was scientifically and economically sound.
Ernestine is doing your claims now...
It's one thing to consume another animal for food, another to torture and cage it for life.  I only eat meat that's raised ethically as well, zoos however are basically feedlots.  There's also not really any irreplaceable educational value to a zoo anymore either.  Sure it's cool to see a weird animal in person, but we have the internet now.  
This, except leave out all of Voyager except the two-part premiere, the movies after First Contact, and all of Enterprise. That will give you back several hundred hours of your life, but hardly deprive you of any Trek goodness ;)
I came here to say the same thing.
So bearded or clean-shaven ? :P
?
I thought I read that the RIAA had stopped suing individual users because it was ineffective. I guess not?
You absolutely don't need to keep hitting the personal insults, i'm just putting across a point of view.  Unless we figure out how to live in space pretty soon (which I suppose we might do) the current model of living isn't doing us many favours is it? We're constantly expanding, consuming the planet's natural resources and where does it end? When they all run out and we begin dying off? Or perhaps more likely we'd shrink into a better sized group that could sustain itself with whatever's left - the people in that group will probably be the rich or intelligent ones.  There's nothing quite life having your life threatened to invoke that survival instinct - and that's when you start putting yourself before others.  I would agree that society does teach us to help one another, it comes to mind as a very honourable thing to do. Lets not pretend i'm condoning rape or murder. Although is exerting any influence available to you to get an organ that would also save someone else's life murder? If you don't need it, i'd be tempted to say yes - but imagine you're in the exact same state as someone else and there's only one organ - you know the decision you'd make if you could - you'd fight for that organ.  The real question w.r.t. to this article then is perhaps how does the government prioritise who's more important, is it merely a matter of urgency with everyone being treated equally or are people such as Doctors themselves prioritised above homeless, jobless* people leeching off the system? * Included because I know a few homeless people with pretty good jobs
Archery. A weird one I know, but lots of fun
Fantastic, more bailouts for auto makers disguised as green incentives and more fraudulent fuel for car dealers and their closest friends. This is exactly the sort of wasteful spending that is killing Amerika.
A very few employer health plans will cover dental work; not sure about the preexisting condition issue. 
Most of the human population is going to be killed off no matter what we do.  And I'm not necessarily advocating a return to pure hunting and gathering, just pointing out that hunter/gatherers don't tend to work as hard as agriculturalists.  
It isn't because every XML API has something like "getNextSibling()".
I don't need it to be thermite. You brought up NIST's dismissal of thermite from their FAQ.   &gt; And i still have not heard any researcher bring up leprachauns, many people have brought up bombs, why not look into it?  First, no, not "researchers". Unedcuated idiots and/or crazy people. You will not and can not find a serious researcher who thinks it (well, you can find a few, but I'll show you that they are straight up psuedoscientists).  &gt; why not look into it?  More importantly, the only difference between leprechauns and thermite is a bunch of uneducated idiots believe in thermite theories, despite how ridiculous they are. And so NIST did give thermite special treatment over leprechauns.. they put up a 4 paragraph explanation in their FAQ explaining why that idiotic theory is idiotic.  That's more than it deserved.  Neither theory deserves any serious consideration because they are both ridiculous.
Cedar. Hopefully with a pizza oven (fingers crossed).
Oh yes. Definitely the US, where I'm now on several meds for my migraines/cluster headaches. 
Fair enough. FWIW, if there's enough traction, I'll probably create a subreddit for this, so we don't spam all over askreddit. I just want to see if there's some momentum here first.
I'm Canadian, and I'd bet dollars to doughnuts that that just isn't true.  We certainly pay much more than $50 / year.  It's still less than the US - probably significantly so - but it ain't $50.  [Wikipedia says $3,678 USD.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Canadian_and_American_health_care_systems_compared)
A lot of people think that because religions and tyrants in the past have claimed to preach "absolute truths" that have turned out to be totally false are now given to the idea that absolute truth itself is somehow invalid.  But this is ludicrous.  What you want to do is to make sure that your absolute truths are actually true, otherwise you're going to continue thinking of lies as absolute truths, whether you're conscious of this or not.  It's the very nature of the mind to think in absolutes.  That is what it is designed to do and that's what makes it effective.  The more universal a conclusion is, the more useful it is because it encompasses more of reality.  We naturally try to refine our knowledge into absolute truths, but we stop short which leads to errors.  Or in the case of science and other types of empirical knowledge, certainty is not achievable, but we still strive towards it asymptotically and it's a useful thing to do.
derpa de derp.   some people make their own hashish, and it is very easy to accumulate softball sized balls of it.
HOORAY!  so happy to hear this!
Are you thinking of finding all the pointers to the object and changing them (how?) or mutating the object in place (what if there isn't space?)?
Why is no one talking sound cards?  It's the one of the most important parts of a music PC.  You'll want to find something that has ASIO support and provides you with a low-latency recording environment. Personally I use an ASUS Xonar DX.  It's actually a gaming card (since my PC is primarily for gaming), but it provides decent sound quality for recording too.  You'll probably want to get something designed specifically for making music -- that which I unfortunately cannot help you with, as I am not completely familiar with those kinds of sound cards.
Canada often supports these military coups. Haiti is another example where Canada chose to support a military dictatorship over the democratically elected leader. 
Nobody can ever say that reddit karma never got anyone laid. 
I think it's a historical throwback to the early days of BBS software piracy..
I like how the chimney gets more shaded as it goes into the dark night sky.  If you had stood a few meters to your left you could have occluded the lamps on the post in the background.  This might have also removed the building that is falling over on the right hand side and maybe allow some of the over exposed areas to be off frame.  With the current shot, I would probably crop away that building.  Thanks for posting.  I'm also trying to improve and it helps me to think about ways to improve others photos.
&gt;You're arguing languages, not tools  Well API's actually, C# is great, but the .Net APIs need improvement.  &gt;The toolset is still second to none.  Visual Studio has gotten much better since 2003, but Eclipse 3.4/3.5 far exceeds VS in features and is comparable in speed.  IntelliJ and NetBeans are pretty good too.  So second to none is a bit of an exaggeration.  But compared to Apple's toolset you are absolutely correct, wish Apple would work on that.
That is awesome. He's playing the audience as an instrument!
&gt; I disagree that it's short sighted in that there are other problems with unsigned types.  There may be other problems, but they aren't relevant to the short-sightedness of this column.  You can't ignore half of your boundary conditions and pretend you're being safe.  And once you consider the upper limit, this particular benefit of signed integers goes away.  &gt; Another issue is the problem with unsigned promotion/demotion to/from narrower/wider types.  They promote by zero-extension and demote by truncating the most significant bits.  What's the problem?  &gt; the unexpected and unintuitive behavior at the boundaries.  The behavior is the same as for signed integers at boundaries, just with different boundaries.  C++ is the wrong language to use if you want to ignore those.  And I don't think they're all that unintuitive if you understand digital logic, but it's been a *long* time since I learned this stuff so maybe I'm not a good judge.
Have you really looked at all religions? What are your opinions on how god is described in Sikhism? I am really curious.
Did it kill the grass?
coz*
Lisa, I want to buy your rock.
It's better to go back and read from the beginning.  I wasn't very impressed with the ones I saw at first, but when I read it straight through, it suddenly became much more amusing, in my opinion.
I'm not sure how to make of this.
I like the part starting around 0:27.  I can see his train of thought like: "Hmm I tried to get that little hole but I missed, let me just invert my body on this wall then I can put my feet *here* and booya!"  Seriously though, wtf.  
A yoga position.  Really.
I am flying in the morning...
The Simpsons weren't so bad. Married... With Children was the *really* edgy show. A few years later Beavis and Butthead came along and usurped that title from Married... With Children. Beavis and Butthead wouldn't shock anyone if it came out today. 
bad logic is bad.
57 seconds, but I lied on all the questions
Yes! Yes! That self-defeating, self limiting mind snap annoys me to no end especially when I recognize latent potential.
this comment was submitted earlier. Who the fuck takes time to type that? Does this person have no job? Are they being paid? Who does that? I just don't understand.. plus, its not of any value whatsoever. At all. zilch. nada. 
Ah, I'm so glad I don't use public torrent trackers.
Check your Thyroid.  Also when your getting that tested get a whole lot of other things tested(which you can get tested from your blood easily enough)...stuff like vitamin/nutritional levels or test yourself for any one of a number of  genetic conditions like [hemochromatosis](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/HFE_hereditary_hemochromatosis).
That's disgusting. We just wanted fawning material.
It's just awesome, that's all.
Mostly because after probably more than 50 hours of play, I could only get up to the boss on level 9.  And that is using all the level warps.  Edit: Actually, looking at the youtube videos of the levels, I did get to level 10 a few times, but by then I'd lost patience with it.
For *you*,  I'm not into making out with someone I don't know in a closet for seven minutes. Spend that seven minutes seducing somebody you actually like and make out/commit advanced activities as long as you want.
Whoops I meant it doesn't consume air time for T-mobile.  In other words, in your Verizon / T-mobile example, it doesn't cost *you* minutes, like you said, but it really doesn't cost T-mobile anything either.
About 20 years ago I took a course in speed reading at Kaplan.  It was like a 4 week program once a week.  The last night they had us read Hemingway's The Old Man and the Sea and I thought my comprehension was actually fairly good.  I mean there was a man, and a sea, and he was in a boat...   Generally I do not use what they taught, but I remember the concepts.  In short - it's skimming.  In practice, it doesn't work that great because you end up missing those really important details that end up biting you in the ass because you kinda skimmed through the memo rather than actually read it.
I don't agree with Ron Paul on everything, but the man makes a lot of sense.  We need more representatives like Paul who are grounded in logic and principles.  Not legislative proxies for corporations we have now.  
www.mint.com is pretty good.
Invalidating your position from Chicago IL.  Two summers ago I was biking with a friend from Muskegon, MI to Chicago, IL, basically following the coast of Lake Michigan. We covered 76 miles on the first day. The next day, we covered another 115 miles, with 15 to go until we'd reach downtown Chicago. It was almost midnight, and we were very tired and minding our own business, when suddenly a Chevy Malibu looking piece of shit car pulled up and matched our speed. The Latino passenger stared at us for a moment and then aggressively asked us if we needed help finding our way around the area. Who does that? Naturally I thought we were about to be attacked, so I immediately took a fast right down a side street. They chased me and drove over a large curb to cut me off on the sidewalk, probably causing a lot of damage to their car. Already on the verge of shitting my pants from thinking I was about to be killed, a short muscular man jumped out of the driver's side and sprinted towards me shouting, "You want to play with me? You want to FUCKING PLAY?" while reaching for a weapon. At the pinnacle of terror, I was hardly relieved when it turned out to be not a gun, but handcuffs.  There was no visible badge on his person. Hell, he wasn't even wearing a uniform. He just had a black shirt with black pants. Nothing about the experience remotely suggested any government authority. He was driving a plain, gray car. I VERY politely explained to him why I was in the area so late at night, why I was confused about his identity, and why I ran. Even after he saw my Michigan ID, and my friend, and our bikes, he wouldn't end his power trip. He even called two more units over and when they arrived, he told them to go search the 100 foot stretch of sidewalk I fled on with flashlights to look for the drugs I was obviously throwing into the grass while I was running away. He sneered and told me that if they find anything, I'm fucked. He seemed to be implying that he thought I might be innocent, yet hoped something would be found in the grass regardless of whether I was responsible for its presence. I guess he was trying to meet his quota through any means necessary. It took about half an hour for him to acknowledge that he had nothing on us, and he finally uncuffed us and let us go.  Oh yeah, and just before we left, the Latino cop warned us to "watch out for the niggers around here", and that the "niggers" would kill my friend for wearing a fanny pack.  I just wanted to point out that some of us have reasons to dislike cops other than youtube videos, and that I personally am blown away that ANYONE in Chicago has a good impression of them.
Thank you!! It looks amazing. 
My girlfriend and I are planning a trip for early '10 to NZ to WWOOF!   I'm glad to you hear you had good experiences...any advice for first timers?
Sweet. I didnt mean to sound like I was insulting your intelligence or anything. Just trying to lend a helping hand just in case you had to go through the same hell I went through getting SS2 to run on a multicore.
&gt;Part of their training was to work at the prisons where they learned to treat everyone like criminals  I've never heard of this.  I do know several (former - nobody does that for too long) corrections officers though and they're worse than cops as far as the cynicism goes.  But I won't even get into what one of their days is like. 
I worked with a woman who was 28 and looked 18 - when she dropped her nephew off at high school they asked her for her hall pass.  Then she got braces...
Wait your gay and you have a fiance? What? How did she feel about that?
that was really helpful, thank you. I'm gonna break it open and see what's up.
thousands of people?  your words not mine.  Keep dreaming. All they found was an engine and a couple pieces of a jet not even the right pieces to the right jet.  Where was the DNA?
especially the fans. 
Just make sure you have a Texas Instruments firewire card if your interface uses Firewire. Read silentpcreview.com if you're going to be recording (it doesn't sound like you will be, but who doesn't want a quiet computer?).
Be careful about misplacing your cat.  You don't want someone nabbing your cat and using the direct memory access issue to find out *everything* that the cat has ever seen you doing.
This has a lot of credibility, especially because it comes from the big scary smoke monster.
I'm shocked that this question is sitting so unloved down here.  This is the first question anyone should be asking.  Do you have a DAW already?  Are you looking for suggestions on software as well?  I've been a life-long Logic user and so I have a Mac.  If you're a Cubase guy, go PC.  It's really dependent upon your software preferences.
on other news, half or redditors been fired
You can make the same thing with a two-liter bottle and a bread-bag taped to the bottom of it. Air-tightness is key.
I believe she's innocent. I also believe that 16 year olds are plenty old enough to consent to sex and many states and countries agree with me.
you should post a pic of the table
Interested!
I'm confused. How can you be bound by a contract when you steal something? How would you come by that contract if you just downloaded a song illegally? Please explain this concept a little bit further or link me somewhere that I can read up on it. Thanks
She had been a little strange on and off, had no manners or up bringing. Which wasn't her fault, she just wasn't raised very well. And yes that was it for me, I was done with her
Don't they still have an official slavery system there? 
except for not considering it a shitty song, i fully agree :)
Heh.  There should be a video game version of the song  "Like a Boss."
Agreed, he got pretty damn bubbly when he "found" the drugs.  It was a little strange that they kept patting him down too.  I don't know, the whole thing was fishy.  
Everyone: this is a terrible idea.  Policing is intrinsically dangerous, and I don't want untrained fuckwits doing it.  Not in a purchased-with-my-taxdollars 65,000$ Interceptor.
All of them inducted after 1990.
Spoids. Spoids!
Communication going up crazily. Like everyone will have an earpiece and have some kind of a smartphone that is of superb quality/battery life and will use it all the time.  Maybe everywhere we go, there will be a stationary, monitor screen "dock" and everyone will carry around like...a device that is basically a harddrive with a keyboard and trackball/pad. It would be like the bottom half of a laptop? no probably more like a blackberry curve or iphone, (that makes way more sense); and you can just connect to that screen wherever you go to watch tv/movies or do work on a bigger screen. So it's the convenience of a monitor screen to work on, in every home or every room, or wherever you wanna set it up, and you can just connect to it with a remote smartphone for more convenience/not having to carry around laptop.   yeah. smartphones. that and much better public transportation and cars will become more obsolete (hopefully?). 
Nah, said I'd feel like one if I posted about them.
Great article. Social Welfare government programs are truly the new Roman "bread". Medicare, Medicaid, Social Security, Food Stamps, Unemployment Benefits.  And we definitely have the "circuses" too:  &gt;Roman citizens were satisfied with a good chariot race. In these modern times, Americans can find entertainment and distraction with 24-hour-a-day cable TV, the Internet, iPhones, iPods, Blackberries, 1.1 million retail stores, 1,100 malls, 17,000 golf courses, Britney Spears, Kim Kardashian, Housewives of Orange County, New York, Atlanta, and New Jersey, American Idol, Survivor, Rock of Love, Flip That House, 660 stations with nothing on, Las Vegas, Disney World, MLB, NFL, NBA, NHL, WWF, porn, and mega-churches all competing to fill the void in people’s lives.
Exercise until you are exhausted, then ingest what ever your preferred substance is, then pass out.
Do you not like any of John's solo albums? Plastic Ono Band and Imagine are pretty good albums IMHO.  Double Fantasy is also pretty good and there are a few singles I really enjoyed as well (Instant Karma, Happy Christmas, Number 9 Dream).  
Meh I'm not so sure this one will happen. There would be too much outcry about "the mark of the beast" crap from the Christians, and being that they are the majority vote, Senators would look pretty dumb going against their own constituents on something like this.  
XSLT is as wonderful as it is horrible.
&gt; "only a Sith deals in absolutes" is an absolute statement  Not if dealing in absolutes is the *definition* of being a Sith...
Remember to burn it when you're done.  Sorry...
C.U.N.T Cant Understand Normal Thinking  not sure where i got this from but i like to think a mate of mine made this up and for some reason now i think reddit is going to tell me differently 
Where the hell is season 5? Its been so long...shudders...
two words: "light years"!
That unicode face is from 4chan but nobody seems to have a problem with it for some reason.
For some reason, this didn't link to the page.  It's [here](http://www.reddit.com/r/videos/comments/96hs2/wanna_watch_a_cop_plant_drugs_on_a_suspect_caught/)  (Thats the link to the new post, it links to the vid.  You can downmod this post, it doesn't seem to work.)
Is the 4th dimension still time? Why not space?
the guy sounds like he is getting so excited that he is about to yell
Yeah, I was sorta concerned for the guy when he announced that he was giving up his day job.
60 million, in 2003 dollars, according to the pdf I just added to my previous post.  I edited it to add the link, so you might need to refresh.  But I'm confused now.  You agree that it's not so much the regulations that drive up the cost?  Edit: let me rephrase that, as it wasn't quite how I meant to ask.  I thought you were stating before that a lot of the cost was due to regulations.
As, much as I love a good run-down of all the most important things in the last few pages, reading about Dan's epiphanies only remind me of how slow he is. 
i checked out the label--i think the boll weevil monument is sexier
So, he pulls it out and jerks it for five minutes in front of her face and I'm supposed to be SURPRISED that he came on her face?
That is medicare.   So, in your opinion, health care should only be ran by non-profits, I just want to be sure that is your position.  What about Auto insurance, what is your position there, and if there is a difference, please explain.  And please explain how other people can be so wrong when they explain this is a bad idea.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VPADFNKDhGM&amp;feature=player_embedded
I'd recommend sticking her on Windows 7 so she doesn't flip out at not having her familiar programs. However...  This might be overkill, but try Deep Freeze. If you can "obtain" the software somewhere it allows you to essentially make any modifications to the file system temporary. Just install all her programs, set everything up, then "freeze" the machine. After a reboot you can literally do anything to the filesystem and another reboot will bring it back to the frozen state.  The only caveat is you'll need to block off say, any of the personal folders she wants to save things as permanently thawed. It's pretty easy to do, but might take some time to work out what "disappears" when she reboots.  Deep Freeze is extreme, but absolutely the best way I've found to sterilize a family member's computer completely. They're constantly running on a fresh install.
OK then get him a Jesus action figure so he can bring and play with the Lord where ever he is!!
Psycho Mantis and Bowser? Are you a fucking child who began playing video games in 1996 and suffered a head injury leaving you stuck in 1998?   Seriously, try your hand at Battletoads or Castlevania or even goddamn Mega Man. Those will show you some hard bosses. 
maybe you need to watch MythBusters...
Bunch of pussies!
Already have my tickets for Anaheim - woo hoo!
AWWWW.
I think some structure would be a great idea -- if you could get more structure then the debates could act like a great repository of information, where you could get the low down on both sides of common debates. 
thats pretty cool... i need one of those... 
*Attacks fujimitsu for 20 damage.*
you're welcome....well deserved. I can't wait to see what happens when she gets her hat btw, I will be watching in  great anticipation. I found you after you did a comic for Charles Christopher, in case you were wondering. 
I asked the same thing [3 months back](http://www.reddit.com/r/beer/comments/8aqw8/does_the_mod_need_help_with_the_beer_subreddit/). 
oh hai : 3
Many programmers can be easily swindled. Those are probably not the ones you want to hire.  For everyone else you'll want to avoid giving off the vibes that give you this label:  http://gawker.com/315809/wantrepreneur
so you think we were better off with bush then, i guess.   i don't.
With a comment like that, you would get downvoted in /r/WhatDoYouThink.
A lot of Heinlein male protagonists are average joes along for the ride while a much stronger, but often secondary, male protagonist makes sure everything happens.
You got it straight, basically. Through muscle contractions, they force the haemolymph through the main veins and then they air dry. If, for example you decapitate an insect right after eclosion the wings dry in a wrinkled form instead.
It said that he couldn't even hold a conversation; they were just shouting him down.  I know people like that.  One is in fact my father.  He doesn't listen to data or new perspectives.  He just shouts louder if you don't agree.
Yeah, I was sorta concerned for the guy when he announced that he was giving up his day job.
It's a statue that someone took a picture of with a moving camera.
Does the envelope have to be at the bottom left? I usually look for it at the top right.
Without some sort of explanation of what the figures mean these results are fairly meaningless.
My landlord tried to pull the same crap on me and I showed her my rental agreement and then told her to fuck off unless there was anything else.
Simply group the doors like:  Door 1 chance: 1/3   Doors 2&amp;3 chance: 2/3   Say you choose 1 and host opens door 2 (of course, there is no car there).  Now, stop and think. Do you grasp that by switching to door 3 you "jump" to a group that had 2/3 chance to contain a car, yes or no?   Door 3 itself might give a 1/3 chance but it is also a member of a 2/3 chance group. The host has opened door 2 so the original 2/3 chance now applies to door 3.  The same is not true for door 1 because you have not been given any information to increase its chances.  It always makes sense to me this way, I really don't know why it does not to other people:s
No, we just don't plateau.   Nothing to go all flat ;) &lt;runs and hides&gt;
&gt; ok, then why is people carrying enough 'something' in to blow the building apart not part of the investigation?   Because it's ridiculously implausible and completely inconsistent with the available evidence. Just like leprechauns.  &gt; Because that idea is equated with leprachauns. By you and NIST maybe, but if it is true or false, people who have questioned it are given more strength because it was dismissed. They should have looked at it and added fuel to the fire. It lends to the idea that they were ordered to be under a certain scope by Bush.  You are basically saying that NIST needs to disprove every idiotic bit of psuedoscience anyone thinks up because otherwise people will believe it. Well Judy Wood thinks it was fucking space lasers. Should they disprove that? Killtown thinks the planes were fucking holograms. Should they disprove that? Some dude (forget his name) thinks the buildigns were brought down by nuclear bombs. Should they disprove that?  They can't disprove shit just because alot of idiots think it might be true, no matter how absurd and stupid it is.  &gt; If someone says it is ridiculous they have to back it up, but not with a basic opinion outside of their expertise on such a serious matter.  You still haven't backed up why leprechauns are ridiculous. Why be a hypocrite?
Ironically he died of pneumonia after going through chemotherapy
A properly designed alcohol engine will generate more miles per gallon than a gasoline engine. Alcohol burns at a much faster speed than gasoline, turning more of its energy into work faster, and more of its chemical energy into work rather that waste heat. In low compression standard engine a 10-15% hit in mileage. In a high compression engine with a little vaporization thrown in and you beat the gas mileage. Especially when you load up a vehicle. A gas engine really drops when you load it up. There is another issue though. Gas, on any day contains over  400 waste byproducts. Byproducts that come from the other things oil cos. make with oil. That's right gas is a toxic dumping ground for the oil companies. They used to dump it in the sewer system. Oil companies make $25000 dollars woth of products from a barrel of oil. Gas is one product of that line. Ethanol is 98% cleaner  burning  than gasoline. 
Apple Genius: Under our warranty, we can not replace your iPhone due to fire damage. Sorry! 
I... I can't tell if this is sarcasm or not. 
I think anyone assuming that ignorance is a product of your nationality has done more than enough to prove that it isn't.
Helping the poor? The development has a far better ROI.  Somehow I think Christ would vomit if he could see many of the organizations that operate using his name.
i said it before, i'll say it again: you are simply outstanding.
Yeah. Just remember that they don't represent the writing style of the whole series, only a section of it.   That is to say, if you don't like Small Gods, try a later book, don't just give up, ok? 
Am I the only one who finds it annoying that macs have a special programming language that really no one uses outside apples little world? Objective-C may be the greatest language ever, but as a developer strapped for time how is learning it a smart investment as I will only use it for mac/iphone development. /rant
Reverse airflow would provide lift, allowing the plane to take off.  It's about angular momentum and torque, mostly.   The speed grows arbitrarily large, as the force is only present when the wheels are accelerated.
HE HAZ THA AYDES!
note who wrote those positive reviews..  ppl from far-right think tanks and organizations.
Yeah, but without any help from Obama, apparently.
Have a third (middle, compromise, alternative) camp...
When girls are 'too tired' for sex.  WTF is wrong with them?
Is this some kind of running joke that I am just not getting?
I hope so. That means I will feel more pleasure.
Now here's a man who knows what he wants.
I'm the other way - I was hoping Anansi would be darker than it was. Which did you read first?
&gt;The best advice that can be given to humanity.  FTFY.
coven = 13 witches.
&gt;That's disgusting  So'z ur face. BOOYAH!
One of them is not like the others...
&gt;I've been out for 4 years or so. [I knew it!!!](http://www.reddit.com/r/funny/comments/95nut/text_a_girl_and_ask_if_her_if_you_can_tap_that/c0bkvxw)
No I think you were right...it's mildly funny.
I think you might want to google the phrase "let a thousand flowers bloom" -- in the 60s there was somewhat of a push to make China more "open", but this "openness" was a trap -- people who made trouble for the CCP during the "thousand flowers" period were mowed down, as it were, by the Cultural Revolution.  The point is that people within China who, from time to time, see opportunities to "work within the system" often end up as bad if not worse off than people who try and overthrow the system. That's the unfortunate side effect of authoritarian systems.
I'm an absolutist, but I apply my absolutism relatively. XD
The DEA has a decent botnet. IRC: narc.oti.cz PORT 6667 join #prevent
Prescription drugs is one of the five basic food groups. Everyone takes them with their meal.
I used to live in a beautiful wild place in an old house that had no indoor plumbing except for a pipe that carried water from the spring up on the hill down into my kitchen.  It was great, but I didn't have a bathroom, and I didn’t particularly want wake up in the middle of the night with a full bladder and have to go outside to piss in all kinds of weather... so I usually kept a piss bottle in my bedroom. And I always had a bottle with drinking water, so I’ll give you 3 guesses as to what I did one night in the middle of the night... and the first 2 don’t count. I got superficially grossed out... and went right back to sleep.  
I agree too -- but I like a bit of structure to my arguments -- its no fun for me when people wander off the topic 
Underrated work of genius.
Rookie: "But captain, lets cut this kid a break.  I think he'll do ok if we just follow up with him and try to convince him to stay out of trouble.  We can try to work with his parents and teachers."  Captain: "Shut the fuck up and book the little piece of shit on burglary.  He'll just come back and shoot you some day if you go all soft on him".
&gt; Not Racist: The black people around me are all really dumb.  If you don't wish to be racist, why even bother to mention the colour of their skin? Just say "Some of the people around me are really dumb". If someone then asks which ones, you could then add that it's the black guys as a method of identifying them to someone who can see them, but unless someone specifically asks for this information it seems totally irrelevant.
Microsoft spends a lot of money "co-marketing" brands like Acer, Asus, Lenovo, etc.  Windows OEM revenue decreased $1.1 billion or 31%, while OEM license units decreased 10%.  So they are charging less per unit
Yo dog, I've seen XML contain XML in the CDATA
Possibly relevant study [here](http://books.google.com/books?id=LkQPOSXMUscC&amp;pg=PA186&amp;lpg=PA186&amp;dq=names+resumes+racism+study&amp;source=bl&amp;ots=4oPoz8oqLS&amp;sig=jDPhAn0PE86TLXQpio-4_6QR0Tg&amp;hl=en&amp;ei=EIxzSpi_NoGuswO7_ND1Bw&amp;sa=X&amp;oi=book_result&amp;ct=result&amp;resnum=2#v=onepage&amp;q=&amp;f=false)
there were some damn precise measurements going on. Look at all those Sig Digs
I'm the same way and I was wondering if there is a correlation with spirituality. Are you an atheist also?
Very clever qquicksilver. You are obviously a co-conspirator. And you got me to read the spam.
Scientists are interested in both improbable and probable theories. Repeating experiments increases the understanding its probability.  If it's successful 100% of a million attempts, there is still a chance it will fail.  The scientist will proceed with other experiments with confidence in the reliability of his previous experiment, perhaps seeming like he's treating like a universal truth, but in fact he appreciates the nature of probability in the situation.  Other times scientist have less confidence in the repeatability of their experiments, but proceed with related experiments anyway.  Like if a drug is effective in 60% of subjects, there's still compelling science to be done with the drug.  Scientists would prefer either or both A and B depending on their subject matter. If each day had an equal probability of being accurately predicted, statement A is true.  Otherwise I can't say. 
Hmm let's get this out of the way.  Do you sneak around and solve complex math problems and hang around with Ben Affleck?
And amazingly, *none of them* died in horrible accidents! Maybe speeding isn't so bad...
If her mind ends up conditioned such that the discussion of sexual things makes her vomit I can pretty much guarantee she won't have sex for awhile.  ^_^
Sign me up.
I think you mean **expensive**.
Top Performer! You made it to Speed Level 5 (out of 5) 59 out of 71 correct
Yea, but the grillz themselves can do nothing but fry.
Oh no. Not again.  (we overdid recursion last week)
Here's a condom. Does that help?
&gt; Moors, Christians, Jews and Gipsies all ruled some part or another at sometime, and even lived in peace together Bullshit. Plain bullshit. Jews and Gipsies have never ruled shit in Spain; they have been permanently opressed and segregated for the last 500 years in the peninsula.  Only Muslims and Christians did rule, and being both "peace religions", every single inch of land they owned was adquired via the most gruesome bloodbath you could think of (yihad on the one hand, la reconquista on the other). They never lived in peace together, and if the Christians didn't succeed on retaking the whole peninsula from Muslims, they'd still be fighting over the same piece of land. Thinking otherwise is being ingenuous, or downright stupid.
Yes, and it is hot as hell.
Even though the Bushs and bin Ladens are business partners? 
Now. And record it. And sell it in the reddit store.
and why won't we see it again?
Wasn't a ring of his picked up by someone after they burned his body on the pyre?
Sounds delicious.  Hope it turns out well.
what are you talking about
The news networks actually do not censor the news but manipulate it or rely on others to produce lies. They spread a propaganda message with such reach and professionalism that is hard to be not misled.
real funny.  give people the impression you are going to murder them.  Why don't you just bring an unloaded gun around and start pointing it at people... oh you jokster.   Someone should break into your house and then say they are going to rape and murder your family... and then not.  HAHAHAHHAHA.  Wow... these pranks just keep getting better. jackasses.
One of the things that pissed me off the most about English Lit. was the fact that the teachers just couldn't enjoy a good story, the bitches had to go digging for [ulterior motives.](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Political_interpretations_of_The_Wonderful_Wizard_of_Oz)  Fine. No brains for you. However, I've recently discovered that the liver is one of the few organs that can regenerate after traumatic injury.  Can I interest any hard drinkers out there in half a liver?
I would just like to say, this shit DOES happen. In my old county alone, there have been two stabbings recently by people under the influence of LSD (They were both &lt;18). I honestly have no clue how it happens, how a situation can escalate to that point. I think it has much more to do with the person then the drug. Just yesterday I told someone on reddit not to over-think/worry about their upcoming trip too much, because the problem isn't people who go online and research their drug, and are cautious about it. It's the wannabe gangsters/mentally unstable people who do these massive amounts of psychedelics and do something dangerous, who ruin it for everyone.
He was an IDF animal and he spends time in Israel with the family. He is a tool and an official gov agent just like you. 
High market share has very little to do with high profits.  Correlation != Causation.   As a practical matter it represents a temporary natural monopoly but it seldom has the normal market control power of a monopoly especially in high tech products.  For products that depend on technology adoption, high market share is extremely dangerous.
Unicorns don't exist.
I've never had any trouble with my AT&amp;T service anywhere I've been in the US so far...SoCal, NW Oregon/SW Washington, Ketchikan Alaska, Florida, New York, Virginia and Maine.
as well as a dikfor.
The sad thing is that this really is a tragic story. And all I can think of is Nick Cage yelling "Oh no, beeeeeees!"
Do you like urine fetish porn?
Thanks for the post, but we need two more things for it to make sense:  1) The original mailing you received.  2) Where you live (at least what state).
I'd much rather see a map of Bell's taxpayer paid for fiber network.
how has no one "fuck yeah"ed the amazon customer reviews for that thing?! no one!? come on guys....
It's a clear example of premature optimization. If you shave, you don't have to ever pick your breakfast out of your beard. (Though, judging by some bearded programmers I have seen, they don't stop for that, either ;)
I have sutures in my mouth right now from having two teeth removed.  I'd agree, if you can save time and get them done sooner, you should.  I had an infection that almost killed me.  I finally ponied up the money and had 'em taken out last week.  I was doing well keeping them from getting infected with a waterpik, which I think is one of the greatest devices ever - what are your thoughts on that?
Well, sometimes if the lights red, but never while in motion...  I'm still ashamed that I've resorted to texting, let alone that I do it at dangerous times...
He raped once and doesn't plan to rape again.  Hence, he is a "former rapist"  I read another article about him, I'm pretty sure he also went back and begged the woman for forgiveness.  He seems pretty sincere in his remorse, moreso than it seems many South African men that commit rape.
That era was the beginning of the "me generation" yuppie phenomena. Times were good. I think it's a perfect example of what I said above.
Every time this subject is brought up I sit dumbfounded for a couple of seconds trying to understand the absurdity of it all. It's fucking 2009 and with all the advancements that have been made to remove real sexual discrimination as well as even possible sexual discrimination from our society, it's an icy dip in a pool to my mind every time realize this shit still exists.   If there was an equivalent registration for women only like this it would have been destroyed into oblivion years and years ago. But, once again, because men are affected, it's all a-ok.
I wonder what the cost-effectiveness of building sets versus just shooting on locations are. Two of those shots (bathroom and theater) could have been done in any local cinema.
If you have to use a leash to tether you child, you are a lazy ass parent. If you have to drag the kid by the leash, you are an utter failure.
Is your name pronounced "Jihad-on"?
I loved the cover of So long and thanks for all the fish.. "The fourth book in the increasingly inacculturatly named hitchhiker trilogy"
A beautiful Gibson Les Paul Goldtop.
Hellllooooo creepy stalker
You forgot leap years. See, this is what you get for reinventing the wheel and not using a library! :-)
Hey it is tough getting by on $250,000 a year, so instead of raising their taxes, let's not bail out the super wealthy and their banks for 24 trillion dollars.
